Favourite name for a boy? Henry
This disturbing question arose on Monday, the day after I normally post my weekly novel installment. Only a handful of chapters, maybe less, are needed now before reaching that final page and doing a victory dance around my computer chair. The end of my novel is definitely in sight and I should be one happy writer. Shouldn’t I?
Bob has repeatedly accused the Commissary General of the Inquisition of dishonesty and subterfuge. But if anyone is guilty of such unseemly behavior it would seem to be Bob himself.
I'm so pleased to have Jellypark as a sponsor for this challenge!! Claire imagines and creates the most wonderful characters which are a joy to colour! And the randomly selected winner will get to choose two images from the brand new Jellypark store as a prize!
Which is why I am off the walls excited about today's Reader Space! Lisa has been determined to make every inch of her home count, and that she has done! With beauty!
But what about those of us who are not called to such obvious leadership roles? How do we advocate for ourselves or learn to find our own voices when even those women whose voices are gifted and called to vocation in the church are criticized, treated with suspicion, or even silenced?
Penny Black 1999L Letter Background
42. Nah tek yuh mattie eye fuh see. See for yourself and form your own conclusions instead of relying on the reports of others.
I loved how all of the characters weren't Amish, and how there was a detective from Cincinnati that comes to help on the murder case - that made the story so much more entertaining!
Fifteen-year-old Charlie feels like a “thrown-away” child even though her unusual mother gives her a life-line as she packs a bag for Charlie and then tells her to run--never tell the secret, never come back, never call. Charlie holds fast to that lifeline and makes a PLAN.
No big white dogs on this trip, however. Sadly, Cheyenne Mountain doesn’t allow dogs on the trails, and so they got to go to dog camp instead. They didn’t seem to miss us in the least. And, two days later, they are still snoozing off the rambunctious mayhem I’m sure they created!
Thanks for popping by!
Tasting notes for this wonderful creation are as follows. On the nose there's definite citrus, hard to be more specific, maybe Grapefruit and Lemon, there's also Mango in there too. To taste is to rise into a temporary Nirvana and forget the world below you, it's more tropical fruit, Mango, Peach and Oranges are there but there's a nice dryness to it which quenches the thirst and leaves you wanting another sip. At 6.8% abv it's a nicely balanced treat for your tastebuds!
It's said that homebrewers tend to under-pitch yeast by a factor of up to ten compared to a commercial brewery, so if you want to up the quality of your beers then look after and pitch enough yeast.
“The lacrosse scandal brought to light in a new way many of the tragic problems facing our University and the unwillingness of the administration to correct them. If we truly love Duke, and truly support its students, then we will take action to repair the University we love and to protect all its students present and future. If we truly love Duke, then we will demand that it live up to its ideals. What sense is it for alumni to criticize Duke, see Duke be totally unresponsive to their criticisms and then to keep the checks rolling in? Is it any wonder Duke perpetually ignores the grievances of its students and alumni? “
When my mom came to pick me up the following morning, I was a ball of electric energy. I couldn't stop talking about being saved and how I was going to get baptised and how I was going to go to Heaven because I'd accepted Jesus Christ as my Lord and Savior and I hoped that she was saved so that she could go to Heaven too. She agreed to come and watch me get baptised, but she wasn't sure about the "church 3 times a week" request I made of her.
The NEW, the everlasting NEW, the everlasting defiance. Ezra has the smell
So anyway, a big “THANK YOU” for having given me such a warm welcome to the group and for supporting me as I struggle through the challenges of always trying to make my art better and even remotely close to the standards we all have for ourselves as we paint and draw. I can’t believe you entrusted to me the post of Exhibits Chair (twice!!!), and I hope we’ll remain close over the distance as my husband and I begin our new chapter in
It’s an exhilarating, if somewhat mystifying, experience to find yourself a supporting player in a modern media maelstrom. It’s even more instructive to learn that a dust-up over a few words can obscure a much more significant message.
“Although (Monday’s) events were unfortunate, we know that it was an isolated incident,” Clark said. “There is no residual danger.”
I had led a "Guided Discovery" today on the correct way to use scissors and glue and in order to practice their knew found knowledge, a quick cutting a pasting work sheet. I explained that not only did they need to cut and glue, but they needed to color too.
7. Big D And The Kids Table - LA X
1. The one who speaks wisdom refreshes as deep waters
QUESTION: Hi, my name is George Miatus (ph), I live here in Jacksonville and when I was 3-years-old I was very blessed that my parents brought me here from Cuba. They brought me here so that I could be raised in freedom and in liberty. President Obama has recently announced that he is liberalizing trade and travel policies. What would be your position as president toward the island of Cuba?
Paper: Imaginisce, October Afternoon, & Sassafras
So cute and chic! But I didn't want to pay for it, so when I saw a similar pattern on BurdaStyle, I just had to make it. I bought some basic cotton off Etsy, and started in, and ended up with this:
The Ayahuasca tea seemed slightly more viscous tonight. Once again, I felt fortunate that the drink went down rather easily and I had no problem with it. Since this was our final ceremony, don Howard and his wife Reyna placed wonderful little bead necklaces around our necks, each with a small pendant of Ayahuasca vine. Now, we waited in the darkness once again – waited for our next inexorable leap into the true unknown.
Games, won’t play your games,
I felt sick. I wanted to cry and run at the same time. I also wanted to lay an uppercut right on his jaw and stamp him into the ground. But I did none of those things. In one of the stop situations of my life all I could do was raise a weak voice and say: “What about the needle Marge... what about the needle?” Marge kinda threw his hands out, like he had no answer. And what did I expect him to say? And even more: what did I expect him to care? Humans are intrinsically selfish. Our first care is usually of ourselves. As I asked Marge about the dirty needle all my care was for Me. I couldn't give a fuck that He was maybe dying; I just hoped I wasn't. And sadly that's just how it is.
EDGAR
For immediate release 19 January 2012
Also last week i was privileged to sample Laddu an Indian sweet normally bought for special occasions. Pronounced La-doo the ingredients can vary but the basic recipe is flour, nuts, sugar, and butter. One of our employees had a baby boy so he was handing these out like cigars. It was very good and the sweet texture fell apart quickly in your mouth. Do I look fat in these jeans?
Thanks so much for your time, Eric!
Jai Ma,
That was the thing. We sent reporters there to cover that, even from Oxford. And we all decided then that no longer would we give Communism the benefit of the doubt.
I've accomplished a lot,especially in the past few years,that I can be proud of.
Be sure to zoom out to check it all out. I included the Boulder, Longmont, and Fort Collins areas because that is part of the GABF experience. Or at least it has been for me over the years! Enjoy and cheers!
Imagine, me not having to say "______, get back to work" and "______, keep going" all day! I think both the kid AND I would enjoy that!
Do corn plasters for ears exist? Or something like that? Piercing both ears at the same time might be a bad, bad desicion. Especially if you’re not able to sleep on your back…
However, Pete’s slightly heroic plans are crushed when Charlie quickly confesses some slightly homicidal feelings. Now Pete has a choice he’s not prepared to make. Either he destroys Charlie’s trust and turns the kid in, or he risks the lives of every human being on campus,
My tomato sandwich is irreducibly complex. A bacterial flagellum is, too, and Unlocking the Mystery of Life does a great job showing the marvelous parts of the microscopic propeller. But I don’t have to go to the bacterial flagellum to find irreducible complexity. I see irreducible complexity everywhere in the universe around me. From the perfect placement of the earth from the sun to the perfect placement of the hand on the arm . . . from the life of a baby I hold in my arms to the morality I hold in my heart . . . I am inundated with irreducible complexity. And I have a decision to make: Will I see the Master Designer behind it all or will I reduce all the wonders of this universe to a level of complexity that blind, random chance will allow?
When friends know you have a blog, sometimes they get demanding. Cavanaugh said something witty at dinner, then pointed his pointy finger at me and said, "write that down." I said, "Oh no, Cavanaugh... you're not becoming one of those 'write that down' friends, are you?" And he said, "Yes, I am, and you can quote me on that."
And proclaim success with my tongue
The irony of all this of course, is that very little people actually seem to care. What could be seen as one of the largest attacks on a front line service in British history is being almost ignored by the press. This isn’t right. Theresa May’s incompetence has been portrayed time and time again recently, over Abu Qatada, the border’s agency and now this. I know 20% cuts have been imposed on the Home Office, but is this really the right thing to do? From an ethical view point at least, most certainly not. Also, with less accountability to the public, how can we guarantee the safety of the public from abuse of power, or even regarding witness statements? It is clear not enough thought has gone into this, and very little public consultation.
I don’t know how you’ll react. I don’t know what kind of “following” this blog will have at that time. It might make you feel uncomfortable, to know that as you were growing up and we were getting to know each other, I was writing about it here. I don’t know how you’ll feel about other people, strangers to you, reading this blog and knowing so much about you and me.
Practical numeracy
Of course, nobody ever met the "father", because father and son were one and the same. He would just arrive at the house of his new employee, in a cab, in one case in dirty clothes and already needing to be changed, carrying a note from his "father", along with money for payment. In this one case it is noted that he also carried a backpack, which contained baby formula. And diapers!
FINALLY into a gift guide, but it just had to the GAG GUIDE! lol
“Can you play ‘Rack City” by Tyga?” Napkin Man asked. “We’re with some bitches and they don’t know about the music you’re playing. They want to hear ‘Rack City’.”
in my Sunday best, you know... a nice skirt and sweater set.
That, my friends, is how to use social media.
They note in the book it is better to use the same scale miniatures as 6mm versus 54mm will be a touch harsh (as bigger guys hit harder).
This one reached the Top Twenty in the sweltering summer of 1975, but in Philly I’ll bet it went way higher than that. Smart and ballsy, just the right length (2:14), and loud enough to drown out Jive Talkin’ playing on that dude’s transistor over there.
Between the bugs, the random DCs, and the fact that monk tanks are incredibly squishy right now, my first experience of monk healing was quite a trial by fire — made all the more difficult by the spec itself.
The first time I ever tired stuffed Jalapenos was on Thanksgiving. At the time my family was living in Texas with no family around. Fortunately for us a nice family from our church invited us over for dinner. She served a very traditionally Thanksgiving Dinner (which I was thankful for) except for these Jalapeno Poppers. After just one taste I was hooked and ate about well more than my share. I loved them so much, I have made them every year for Thanksgiving Dinner. I have added a small little twist to her recipe by adding lime to the cream cheese. It just added another little kick that your guest won't be excepting. So if you want to add some spice to your Thanksgiving Dinner this year, be sure to make these.
08. Het café der blije harten - Johan Verminnen (Belgium) / 2:59
Synopsis: Gretchen Rubin had an epiphany one rainy afternoon in the unlikeliest of places: a city bus. “The days are long, but the years are short,” she realized. “The years are passing, and I’m not focusing enough on the things that really matter.” In that moment, she decided to dedicate a year to her happiness project. Rubin chronicles her adventures during the twelve months she spent test-driving the wisdom of the ages, current scientific research, and lessons from popular culture about how to be happier. Among other things, she found that novelty and challenge are powerful sources of happiness; that money can help buy happiness, when spent wisely; that outer order contributes to inner calm, and that the very smallest of changes can make the biggest difference.
When did laughter whither and sand dry your throat?
I was prompted to write this blog entry today with the very sad news of the death of one of the co-founders of Diaspora, 22-year old Ilya Zhitomirskiy. I'll be writing on Diaspora soon and making important contrasts with Facebook, Google+ and Twitter. I think Diaspora is incredibly useful and will argue why in a later post - including recommending why you should switch from the latter three tecnhnologies to Diaspora.
Family time
"Right," Daghdha started off at a quick run, "let’s go bag our share."
bringing happiness into people’s days
Ok everybody I am home, I am ready for the giveaway, my HP kits are finally going out and Bethany seems to be doing alright although a little under the weather today. For those of you who don't know, my Daughter Bethany had to have emergency brain surgery and it really really has set me back, and then there were problems with paypal and then I can't reply to your comments yada yada yada!
This month we would like to see your
Try to have a wide range of price points. Inexpensive items are great for impulse buyers and are a good way for buyers to "try out" your work (I've had a few buyers purchase a little art card for under $8 then later come back and buy a bigger piece). Also, if you have an amazing item that took months to make and that you'd only sell for thousands of dollars, add that too! Even if it doesn't sell, it's likely to draw attention to your shop!
Eventually, I decided to go and see what they were up to, hoping that they might give me some sort of inspiration for the day’s post. Sometimes they’re playing an interesting game, or being wonderfully creative, amazing both myself, as well as their worldwide readership. I was especially hopeful for this, as they had taken colouring supplies from the office, and had trundled back to the living room earlier.
So friends, that's your challenge...take inspiration from this fabulous photo.
This compares to 5,300 deaths of people who were put in the “support group” – which accounts for 22% of claimants – for the most unwell, who get the full, no-strings benefit of up to £99.85 a week. We don’t know how many people died after being found “fit to work”, the third group, as that information was “not available”. But we have also found that 1,600 people died before their assessment had been completed. This should take 13 weeks, while the claimant gets a reduced payment of up to £67.50 a week, but delays have led to claims the system is in “meltdown”.
The platform, which Amazon says is still in beta, offers more than 1.2 crore products from over 14,000 brands and hundreds of retailers. Amazon lists Homeshop18, UniverCell, Hidesign, Gitanjali, The Bombay Store, Fabindia, Bata India Limited, Dabur Uveda, Microsoft India Store, Reebok, and Amazon.com, as some of the biggest ones. Users cannot directly buy anything from Junglee.com as the government is yet to allow FDI in multi-brand retail. Amazon is branding it as a purchase decision making site than a pure transactional site.
I had another dream last night that involved 2 weeks. I can't remember what it was. All I remember is waking up at some point and thinking it's strange that I had two dreams involving 2 weeks.
2. Team Edward vs. Team Jacob. Personally, I'm part of team "Shutup and read the books, they're fictional characters!"
The one dish that totally bowled me over was the side of Channa Masala - chickpeas. Heck, I don't even care for chick peas and I just couldn't stop eating them. Authentic or not, I didn't care, I finished the whole bowl, licking it clean. They were surprisingly and totally irresistable. Definitely check them out, whatever else you order, if you end up dining at Dosa.
For everyone.
Western herbal medicine recommends hawthorn (Crataegus laevigata or C. oxyacantha) to help prevent long-term angina, since this herb strengthens heart muscles’ ability to contract.
When she’s not writing, Shelley often attends conferences and reader retreats in order to give workshops and publicize her work. She’s attended RWA’s national conference six times, the ACFW conference and Romantic Times Magazine’s annual conference as well as traveled to New Jersey, Birmingham, and Tennessee to attend local conferences.
However, this battle for peace is not going to be an easy one. We have to swim against the tide of hatred and come out as winners. We might have to go against our parents, elders, society to enunciate our own beliefs. We might be chided or mocked for our innocent principles, but it is to be remembered that it is a child’s innocence which God loves the most. In this battle of peace, we need to have that innocence of a child and the perseverance of a man to pass on our conviction to others. We must build strong faith on the essence of humanity. We must love and respect one another irrespective of our caste or religion. At any point of time, we must not get carried away by the strong insinuations of the elite and the powerful. Resisting the temptations of personal benefits or revenge is important and should be followed devotedly. And we should never give up. We must believe in our dream with sincerity and determination. It is our hands, in which the future lies. If our desire for unity remains untainted, nothing can stop us from achieving what we want.
It’s weird that I’m training for a training camp. It’s almost like cleaning my condo for the arrival of my cleaning lady!
It's important to realize that part of the trouble we have in changing our beliefs is that we believe that it is difficult to change a belief.
The Bastille 1789 has a mashbill of barley and wheat grown in the northeast of France, an area that has long supplied barley for some Scottish distillers. It is fermented in Cognac with water from a spring in the Grand Champagne sub-region of Cognac. The distillation is done in alembic pot stills normally used for making brandy. It is aged in a combination of French Limousin oak, cherry wood and acacia casks, then blended.
Here’s a prime example of what we want to have growing all over the place. Not necessarily bergenia x schmidtii (Elephant’s ears), Tulbaghia violacea (Society garlic) and Helleborus foetidus (the delightfully named “Stinking Hellebore”) but carefully chosen water wise and suitable edible food plants for our edible food forest. These plants are forming a mass of green mulch that keeps moisture in the soil. I am not interested in clean lines in my garden, I am more interested in being able to keep the moisture in the soil and constantly increasing the nutrient quotient of our denuded dirt. We are using permaculture principals and weaving in any and everything that makes sense and that will assist us in what we want to eventuate here from all sorts of integrated natural systems. This is my nest and this little black and white bird is going to feather it however she sees fit. Some things will work, some wont. Swales would be a nightmare here as we can’t dig our soil thanks to masses of volcanic rock. Thinking outside the box is our newfound strength and we are using our horticultural knowledge and scavenged information from the 4 corners of the globe to effect change
If you choose to sell, you might set a date for a yard sale. Or, take some photos of these items with your digital camera, and put them up for sale at an online auction Web site.
nachos
Email: jeffL@thetwocentscorp.com
Against time that swiftly flies by
Satanic Victory (Alternate Art work on Orange Vinyl)
Bodie is off the beaten track. On Tuesday 3 May 2011, it was particularly off the beaten track. Melting snow and mud meant visitors had to walk the last mile and a half of the dirt road just to reach the town. Parts of the road were dry, parts muddy quagmires, parts covered with snow that threatened to slip you up or swallow your foot up to mid shin as it broke through the icy crust. The high altitude makes your heart pump and has you gasping for air. It took us nearly an hour to walk that mile and a half.
When I took her out of the bath, she ran down the hall and pulled the hurricane lamp off of the record player. Tiny gravel everywhere.
Talk about an eye-opening moment. That did it for me. I talked to hubby, who simply said: "No kid should go hungry.". And he wasn't talking about Kerri. So I wrote a note in Kerri's school agenda to her teacher. I told her what was happening, what Kerri told us, and offered to provide snacks for the classroom to prevent this from happening. I wanted to send some right away, but hubby asked me to wait for the teacher's reply. So I ended my paragraph with "Please tell us how we can help.".
MONDAY, Feb. 20 (HealthDay News) — New studies show that children struggling with their gender identity also face higher risks for abuse and mental health problems, including post-traumatic stress disorder.
This is the second time, the English and Norwegian Defense Leagues shut down a facebook page in support of a free and fair trial for Breivik.
fascinating
That's about 6 times the power of a common large battle rifle chambering like .308 or .30-06; and about 12 times the power of the standard 5.56 nato assault rifle chambering.
20Cursed is he who has sex relations with his father’s wife, for he has put shame on his father. And let all the people say, So be it.
Today I'm almost back to normal ( whatever that means?) and as I was putting away the goodies I had bought at the Quilt-Stem meeting… I found the fabric I bought for the prize ( for naming my machine) …. so I figured I better pick a name!
R’IL’N: a planet sterilized by a nearby nova some two hundred thousand years ago. The human-like inhabitants, the R’il’nai, fled in several groups to other stellar systems, but the groups lost touch with each other.
Well it means he is ours. We are approved and they accepted us and did an "official" match with him.
And even saying things like "Oh, he's showing his feminine side!" when a boy expresses emotion or "What a little tomboy!" to a girl who is rock climbing feeds into this. Saying that they are "breaking the mold" just enforces that there is a mold to be broken. Boys can be sensitive. Girls can be tough. It can be "boyish" to cry. It can be "girly" to run and be loud.
I'd been doing so well. I was fine during the whole exam, as she gridded off a map on his back. The panel of allergens was no big deal, just tiny polka dots, cooking under the skin like the last time we did this, bubbling up a reaction, hopefully. Something to make it worth the trip. Something to explain why he couldn't breathe.
Did I miss something? What the heck happened to your shower door? Or should I even ask?
Here are what our great DT have created for some inspiration
A man absolutely hated his wife's cat and decided to get rid of him one day by driving him 20 blocks from his home and leaving d cat at the park. As he was getting home, the cat was walking up the
Today, America and Israel appear to be joined at the hip, and America’s military commitment to Israel’s preservation is taken for granted. In fact, today American foreign policy in the Mideast is perceived by the Islamic world to be one and the same as Israeli policy. Whether or not Israel and/or America are able to confront the apocalyptic threat of total war in a direct state-on-state confrontation with Iran or any other hostile neighbor is of less near-term significance. The promised barrage of conventional long-range rockets and missiles promised by Hezbollah and Iran may already threaten her foundations today. However, before such a confrontation the weapons technologies will likely find their way to unconventional warriors, whether Palestinian or other radicalized Islamic youth. As for U.S. responsibilities, there exists among them a common perception of a joint U.S.–Israeli policy that hardens as it did those who successfully infiltrated Israel as terrorists in the past.
The Petaling Jaya Utara MP added that the AP system served no other purpose than to make its beneficiaries “instant millionaires.”
Spread large sheet of wax paper on work surface, and dust with oat flour, if using. Transfer date mixture to wax paper, and use paper to press mixture into 1/2-inch thick rectangle. Wrap tightly, and chill overnight.
2 pc. Green Apples
And make thy influence good or ill –
As my rushes got stronger, so did my focus. I let my body float in the water at times, other times getting into the hands and knees positions. Again, both positions felt right and I loved having the freedom of movement to decide which was most comfortable and efficient at the time!
and u can unlock it by talking to mr pickall by giving him 10k mesos and the rewards are totally random i so far got 5 screws and 100 watermelon..
John 11:17-27, 38-44
General statements: Holy FUCK this show can’t write in female characters. I remember one, ONE named female character that wasn’t turned into a sex object in some fashion at some point. Haruka’s friend who helped her after she escaped and I can’t even remember her name! Other than that most characters just aren’t portrayed in any interesting or realistic fashion, and they’re all just so bland. Most of them seem to rely on just their character designs to get people into them.
But (and it’s a huge “but”), the Facebook IPO should have very little bearing on the situation, as it exists today. I think the thing I am struggling to understand from the analysts pumping Zynga as “a play on the Facebook IPO”, is what bearing the IPO cash will actually have on the Zynga/Facebook relationship. I can’t see a clear connection between a cash-rich Facebook on May 18th, and shareholder value being generated for Zynga-holders.
「不毛です。」
Is that the free market? Or do facts not matter?
with tiny toenails and no hair
Hooray! It's Market Street release week sneak peek time! This is my first time to be participating as a Design Team member, and I must admit it's so exciting to be the first to see what fabulous stamps Angelica designed. Now it's time for y'all to see some of them in action! I hope you joined in the fun yesterday to see Comforting Florals (if not, make sure you head over to this post on the MSS blog to check that set out). You can see all of today's sneaks of Autumn Greetings in this post. There is one more set to sneak peek tomorrow on the MSS blog, then all the sets are revealed and released Thursday at 7:00 Central. There is also a special release sale! You get 15% off each individual set, or 25% off if you purchase all of them (Promo Pricing valid 8/25 7:00pm CDT - 9/1 11:59pm CDT).
The melting pot crew–
Joining a local writer’s guild almost kept me from writing. I say “almost” because I have since come to love it and look forward to the monthly meetings. It was because of fear – yeah, that old chestnut – that I nearly didn’t participate at all.
“Except my really bad dating life.”
STEP 3: Remove from the heat and leave it to cool.
due to this lack of wisdom "this DiGital Wisdom" i know MoST of you are obviously far more elite + wise than myself with the ways of the computer age.
Last night in psychology Peaches was acting odd. Since our falling out (her acting like a spoiled brat and moving out without a thank you or many words spoken between us) we've been cordial to each other. We had two classes together this term and will have two classes together next term. It was awkward to be in the same room with her AND sitting together (creatures of habit) but we made it work. There was always small talk like "how's your hand doing?" (her) and "is your brother still in jail from his DUI?" (me) Last night was different. We were chatting and joking with each other just like we use to. There was even a point where she put her arms on my shoulders and gave me a hug...ODD! We made plans to go out tonight with some people from class and I'm just not sure about it. I want to go out and celebrate that this term is OVER(!) but I don't know if I'm ready to go out with HER. Dirty thinks I should go out and have a good time but just keep in mind that Peaches is Peaches and she'll never change.
We chose the Toulouse breed as they are not aggressive and having an agriturismo, we wanted people to be able to go near them at least without being chased away! Debra who writes the blog Bella Bagni di Lucca, came to see us recently and got to meet them in person, so she can vouch for them.
1. Somebody That I Use To Know…Yea, the doormat version of myself …she’s gone now, tootles.
Furthermore, the practical failure of Leftist economic ideas was well evident to all who would see in the final decades of the 20th century, so that awareness, combined with the rising levels of public education, meant that some limited forms of economic rationality could be made to have popular appeal and get through the processes of democratic politics to implementation. So some Rightists did eventually have enough vision to embrace publicly and actively promote change in a "neo-liberal" direction and did turn some neo-liberal ideas into reality -- a reality that soon spread throughout the world.
Amazon UK
A section on the website where donations can be made online.
it travels where its haunting love songs
There really are no words.....
Dialogue: 6,0:17:40.21,0:17:46.41,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Kamiyama High has a lot of clubs, so of course, there are a lot of recruitment posters.
As it is for other spiritual statements in the Word of God, in order for this Word of God to reach our hearts and thus have any effect on our lives we must first, personally identify with it, accept it in faith, and let it make its home in our hearts! This is what is meant by a “Rhema” word – a Word that has been activated to produce fruit for His Glory!
I will plant a bush on my side of the fence this year. It will take several seasons before it becomes a gathering place though. So what you see in these photos are fruits of my former bathroom safaris. If you close your eyes, you can almost hear my husband pounding on the door asking,”What the heck is taking you so long in there?”
She very confidently responded, "Like a director". An orchestra director. I laughed so hard because it is just not one of the more common things a 4 year would choose to be when that 4 year old grows up. She said just like her Granddad and Mr. Will (who is the choir director at our church.)
I'll have that fear again to face.
Etheridge
- Establishing an Authoritative Source for All Knowledge.
1 tsp. ground cumin
Hello, Rotherham:
The answer is of course no.
Evening Telegraph - Saturday 07 January 1899, page 3. In this balance sheet the assets were £300,000 less than in the company's books. And the liabilities £200,000 more. Though, as we'll learn later, the Pattison's weren't too happy with some of the valuation in this balance sheet.
Yes, I'm a bit late again.... :)
Fettuccine with Beef Short Ribs, Caramelized Onions and Gorgonzola. I had a really hard time deciding which of the two pastas I ordered I liked better, this one or the classic Bolognese. Both were exceptional, and were good matches with the Pinot Noir, Barbaresco and Sangiovese varietals.
He did it for love,
1 curled
Here are the facts:
parties talking about innocent mistakes, stupid mistakes or youthful
“Has the civil service deteriorated from what it used to be?’ asked Luak, who was one time the Divisional Development Officer.
And shall I fear to own his cause,
Words that remind me of Kathy: La Dolce Vita. A La Famiglia. And Joie de Vivre.
From Chicago, the town that goes from 90 degrees to 62 degrees overnight, it's your host, the woman who learned a new football term (it's apparently called sacking the quarterback, not pushing over the guy with the ball), Dawn Meehan! Here are answers to this week's viewer mail...
For one, I went winetasting, got pretty buzzed, and then got offered a new job. But that was probably the least exciting surprise.
arms together
- Jim Lamb, Queensland Australia, 31/3/2012 05:00
cold mint tea (from the garden),
World two: The agony of so much of the world. The poverty. The death. The starvation. Sickness. Things I cannot write about here because I will protect my children's privacy but suffice it to say we are in the midst of some deep, deep stuff. And let me tell you that mothering as an adoptive mother, more specifically as a transracial international adoptive mother is just like any other mothering except it isn't. Not in the least. It never will be.
every weed I've plucked from the garden
Using the new measure, the Anti-Defamation League logged 1,211 anti-Semitic incidents in the United States in 2009. It included 422 cases of anti-Semitic vandalism like swastika graffiti, as well as violent episodes like the murder of a security guard at the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum in Washington.
They will not accept a tip.. well, sometimes one will but it is rare.
This February 18th she will have been gone for 21 years, and I miss her still today. But I know that one day, as I prepare to draw my final breath, Mae will be there waiting to greet me, along with all of the other loved ones that I miss... Pap Sifers, Grandma Re, Pap Cullison, Aunt Wanda and so many more... and they will be in the company of my Savior, who I long to see.
Then last night I told the girls we were going to run around the neighborhood twice to get our exercise right after I put the boys to bed. By the time I got the boys to bed, the girls had all run their two laps and Lauren was showered and ready for bed! I was telling Jon on the phone about it and how now I would have to run alone. Lauren heard me.
“Come on Bitch!” she was shouting once again, “Come on Bitch! I said make me cum!” Pam was aggressively moving Olivia’s head up and down on the stick. You could hear Olivia’s mouth making slobbering sounds as the saliva ran down the stick. Pam kept shouting,
To the modem mind, as represented by Mr. Wylie, this is warped vision which "bears little or no relation to the truth as it is known today." The Catholic who does not write for a limited circle of fellow Catholics will in all probability consider that since this is his vision, he is writing for a hostile audience, and he will be more than ever concerned to have his work stand on its own feet and be complete and self-sufficient and impregnable in its own right. When people have told me that because I am a Catholic, I cannot be an artist, I have had to reply, ruefully, that because I am a Catholic I cannot afford to be less than an artist. Flannery O'Connor
What makes a marriage? I can tell you with complete certainty it is not the things that we didn't have at our wedding 15 years ago. I do not regret not having any of those things. I don't miss them at all.
The Midnight Club
He was stricken; it may be, after all, he was stricken at Waterloo.
The slum dwellers of Nonadanga, evicted on 30th of March, have rebuilt their shanties. After the rallies, demonstrations, mass-protests and the 12 day long hunger strike movement, right when the slum dwellers under the guidance of eviction-resistance committee (Uchchhed Protirodh Committee) have built the shades over their head, the government came down again with its brutality on the slum dwellers on the 28th of April. Eleven people were arrested including 5 women on fabricated charges. Till date two of the previously arrested supporters of the movement has not been released by the state.
It was also my birthday today. At forty five years, I have finally taken a risk in my life, and I have to say as nerve racking as it is, it is also very liberating. Okay, it might not work out but in the process I am meeting lots of lovely people, and its giving me some life experience, as they say better late than never!! I had almost forgotten what it is to be anything other than a mum or wife, I have lost in essence my own identity, maybe this will help me re-find it. I know don't want to run my own shop forever, but maybe while running the shop, I will get some answers as to what direction I do want to take my life in.
To celebrate, Rhino channels the album’s relentless blitzkrieg of musical aggression onto a two-disc Deluxe Edition. The CD includes the original album remastered and “Piss”, a recently discovered unreleased track from the recording sessions. The DVD contains an unreleased live performance filmed in Italy in September of 1992 plus the three official music videos from the album.
Hope that some of you will come along to Edinburgh this Saturday. You won't regret it.
Remember the so called ethnic clashes of 1992 and 1997 that ostensibly pitted Kenyan tribes against each other but in reality were methodically planned from within the government itself?
Got our first Wii! Well, ok, it's not the first gaming system in our house, but we finally joined the rest of the world.
Yet, there has been only superficial attention to who Whitehead is and what he stands for — despite a lengthy public record of controversial remarks. During his legal-religious career, for instance, Whitehead has asserted that democracy is “heresy”; that the defining aspect of history is the “race war” between Christians and non-Christians; and that the harsh Calvinism of the “Puritan Fathers” is the standard to which temporal law should strive.
Friday afternoon Okay, I managed to convince the doctor to give me a steroid shot on account of my "family reunion" that I couldn't miss tonight. Feeling better. Actually, feeling pretty awesome right now. A little jumpy. Can't feel my left leg from the knee down for some reason. Eyes are on fire. Don't care. This concert is sooooo happening!
- Mention your placement year to friends and family so they can keep an eye out for opportunities, it’s often a case of knowing the right person…
A former US Air Force Captain, Brown is a current mission pilot in the Civil Air Patrol, and provides accurate information and descriptions of the workings of this group who rise to the task of protecting Americans everywhere.
So, how do you make a quilt when you don’t know how to use a sewing machine and refuse for your first project to be hand sewn? You learn how to use a sewing machine. Now, I told you all I married a great man. I’m so serious about that. He knows that, at times, a gentle nudge from him is all I need to get going. One night, he set up the machine, put the owner’s manual on the table, looked at me and said, “Read, now!” What he didn’t say (but because we are one I instantly pick up on these things) was, “And don’t get up until you know how to use it.” You know I didn’t move, right?
You understood the beauty of my days.
Hooray! We got to fly on the last day of our competition. It was looking dicey in the morning as the wind was already starting to blow, but our meet organizers were determined to get us a flight...well all of them except for Mark who said he would 'eat his shorts' if a task was called and was forced to do exactly that at the party Friday night...
· Will Greer (Grandpa Walton)
Next I will show you just two of my BMs that I happened to get pix of.
Clearly, the opposite of division is unity. Let it be our goal to unify in the name of Christ Jesus to be about our Father’s business. As we prepare for Christ’s second coming we need to become one body. Although you may be part of the arm and I may be part of the leg, I need you as much as you need me. Of course with Christ as the head, the Master. We are the Church. If we have arms, a torso, and feet–how can we walk without our legs? Or how can we have every other piece but no patella (knee cap)? There is no such thing as missing a big piece or a small piece–God doesn’t halfway do things so we must be whole. If we have our eyes set on the Lord and His plans then everything will fall into place. Don’t allow the confusion and disjoining of the enemy to weaken your testimony. Get out of titles and get into Christ.
I made another piece of furniture to sale. This time I brought out the spray paint.
We are going to have to change our routine this year for a couple of reasons. One, we cut down the hedge that gave us cover and two, the bigger kids are on to us. Last year, we over heard one little girl say to her younger brother, "This is the house where the people yell really loud at you, so don't be afraid". Games up. So we are going to put on our thinking caps and come up with something new...any ideas?
But the safety enhancements will be delayed at least until next year. City council only meets once more before the municipal election, and none of the proposed projects has been budgeted for.
It’s a sad fact that most people who do win the lottery wind up blowing it on useless crap. They usually end up back at the same place they started. Wondering what happened to all their cash.
What inspired you to be interested in this topic?
May we all work to keep America great and exceptional, humbly holding self evident truth's in our hearts and boldly proclaiming the ideals and principles of liberty our Founding Fathers fought and died for, and that our military men and women have fought and died for ever since.
· They believe that we will be perfected here on earth
5:30pm. Free! Fairly informal, and at the St Lucia Uniting Church (where my Grandfather is the Minister). We attended their last event, and it was lovely. Prior to attending, you learn/know an appropriate song, either on your own or collaboratively, and perform in the church. I was expecting epic music failure, but a woman sang a heartwrenching a capella, there was a classical musician who performed a Mozart piece note-perfect, and The Academic (after much prodding from me) exploded my heart by getting up and singing an old gospel spiritual song completely a capella. It was one of those moments in life where you're just watching something incredible unfold, and you're just sitting there awestruck. Come along! You don't have to be Christian (but if you're not respectful, I'll smack the heck out of you).
:: Catalina :: We took advantage of having my parents here so along with my parents, my brother, Oli and I trekked over to the beautiful island of Catalina. Definitely want to go back sometime.
David and I have a big year ahead of us! We will be making a BIG move (and by big, I mean like over an ocean big). Well... the big move won't be until this time next year but the preparations and all that leading up to it will take a lot of trusting and leaning on God.
5. Before you leave, set a goal or vision of what you want to achieve when you get home. This can keep you occupied when you arrive back home and help overcome repatriation shock quicker.
Tomorrow I will let you all know what we did this weekend. Have to have something for tomorrow to post. So see you then.
Unfortunately, I can’t simply write a blog on everything that I read or every bit of information that upsets me because I see too much of it every single day. I work for a newspaper company as an editor and I am often tasked with editing copy that has to do with the most abhorrent people on earth. Currently, something I get stuck with a lot is the Tori Stafford case and I WILL NOT get into detail with you the reader about it because I would not want to plant that seed in your brain. But it’s hard, so hard, to read this kind of thing. I have the misfortune of being unable to block out thoughts of the victims in their last moments or even just before.
Oh, this one is so very difficult right now. It was difficult in the past, too, before the rewording, but certain events in my life this year have made it that much worse. I would love to be able to say that my life is virtuous, but that would be such a lie. I’ll be working on this one…
“Love is so supremely important.”
This is not a “do we deserve to have Our Lord die on the Cross for our souls” question. It is a question of how men treat one another. In this society, the context that we have created for ourselves, does humanity have the right continue existing, continue hoping?
It'll be something new tomorrow. I've often been part of an interviewing panel, but next week, for the first time, I'll be observing applicants teach before the interviews. They always do take a class and are observed as part of the process, it's just that I haven't been involved before. It will make for a busy week as, if I'm doing it with one, I'll have to do it with all, but it's all more fun than housework, hey.
“Because I look like the actor Song Joongki, I got called ‘mediocre Song Joongki’. Meaning I was a Song Joongki we could meet in your daily life. Haha. During high school I did band music. I also won an award at Bucheon-si’s Rock Festival. I liked music from pop singers like Jamiroquai and Maroon5.”(Baekhyun)
Thomas P. Holohan, 36, Chester, N.Y.
This year Mother Nature gave him a lovely present.
I grimaced; Humid State, where Uncle Car Salesman, Aunt Ostentatious, Blonde Cousin, and Pretty Hair once lived, is hundreds of miles away.
1/2 cup chopped fresh cilantro
He said that the ANC had had problems with the Freedom Charter for some years now.
No, it was the time I decided that I wanted to wear contact lenses. Well, I didn’t really want to wear them, like for eyesight. I wanted to put one in my eye just to see what it felt like.
I liked the funny ears on this guy. The photograph makes his eyes look different because of the glare, but now I'm thinking that the eye on the right looks like it has a funny eyebrow... and I might try that intentionally next time. SO what do YOU think??? Feel free to comment, but DEFINITELY put that mouse to work and click SOMETHING!
Now, for the real paint...YIKES!! I chose purple. I demonstrated what happened when I mixed purple with white and then with black. "Mrs. Lee, you are AWESOME!" Tee Hee! Have I mentioned that I love my Kinders. They are so easily impressed! Their turn now! I let each student choose their color (red, orange, yellow, blue, green or purple). I gave each of them their own paper plate with their color, their color with white added, and their color with just a drop or two of black added. I folded another 12 X 18 white sheet of paper into fourths. We painted the first section with their color, the next section with the tint of their color, the next section with the shade of their color. The last section was all three of those colors mixed together. This is what an orange one looked like.
Scary – Both of these magazines have used very vague terms for these new “rules”. I have to ask by which guide line are they judging these terms with? If a photographer removes a zit from a girl’s face who is going on a makeup ad, is that “enhanced post-production” that will “mislead consumers”? If I go in and slightly give a girl whiter teeth for a toothpaste ad, will that image be banned? News flash people no one naturally has “pearl” white teeth, I know genetics are a bitch. Where is the ling going to be drawn for all of this? Vogue if a girl is naturally slender framed but has a beautiful face, can they no longer be Vogue models? I am just worried that this is all going to based on someone’s personal opinion, more than likely someone who doesn’t understand the truths of photography or post-production. I have to ask, is it needed? Do these magazines and people really believe that the general public is so stupid that they can’t figure out some of this stuff? Ladies are you so dumb that when they show a model with obviously unnatural eye lashes that you think that a simple gel substance can make you lashes look like that? NO! These ads are not trying to mislead, they are trying to give you an impression. They are giving you the impression that their product will make something better in your life, they do not promise miracles or magic. They are not saying that their product will change your body at the genetic level to make you something that you can never be. They are trying to say “hey look, our product will make your eye lashes look better” and that is all.
Louie also made Izzy and Benny's luncheonette his second home. He could usually be seen sitting on one of the chrome-plated stools by the counter with a cup of coffee and a small spiral notepad and pencil. Most of the time before he saw us walk in, he would usually be scribbling in his notepad unaware of anything around him.
Next Headline Please
Who runs you in darkest dreams,
On a final note – I’m going to make a valiant attempt to start posting again at least a few times a week, if not more. Even if it’s stupid. I’ve been so busy for so many months now and it really has been almost impossible to get here and post most of the time. But I feel better when I do, so I’m going to make an effort again and guess we’ll just see what happens. I’ve decided it wasn’t just because the week of the flood was so grim and critical – it just felt better, being on Twitter more, being here more. So there you go. It might get really dumb around here, but I guess that’s okay too.
I’m open to ideas, but I’m thinking that pot’s going to have to be WAY sweeter before we see a whole lot of improvement…
Indication electricity—This time period means the Indication of electric power in the automobiles through to an energy download without the need for internally connected wire connections. This electricity production is proper in milliwatts.
of resisting change.
I would lie to my mother , it was against her rules.
So why don't more houses fall down?
Elizabeth Margaret—better known as Em—has always known what life would contain: an internship at her father’s firm, a degree from Harvard and a career as a lawyer. The only problem is that it’s not what she wants. When she gets the opportunity to get away from it all and spend a month with the aunt she never knew, she jumps at the chance. While there, Em pursues her secret dream of being a chef, and she also learns that her family has kept some significant secrets from her, too. And then there’s Cade, the laid-back local surfer boy who seems to be everything Em isn't. Naturally, she can’t resist him, and as their romance blossoms, Em feels she is living on her own terms for the first time.
Put water in a pot and bring to a boil. Put all the ingredients in the boiling water. Let it simmer under medium heat for around 20 minutes. Serve hot with steamed rice.
As such, my brother who went with me didn't like it as much as I did.
1 lb chicken tenders, cut into chunks
DJs:
It’s an overlooked aspect of the euro-zone debt crisis and Greece’s probable default: the hand that former European communists (now top members of the European Parliament) had in creating the euro-zone’s command-and-control economic system, along with the trappings of a common (and dubious) European culture. Now it’s all coming apart — a calamity that’s threatening the viability of the euro-zone and rattling the global economy.
The room was full by the time we got there, and many of us experienced our first conference disappointment. Thankfully, Mike (@irishmikeh) had reserved two seats and we managed to get in…I then came out two seconds later to loudly announce to James (@theteacherjames) that Mike had reserved him a seat too (it was my first ever conference lie!), thus getting him past the ‘bouncer’ who clearly had missed a huge career opportunity in riot control. This very same scary ‘bouncer’ came in several minutes before Anthony’s talk to chase out the couple of people who were sitting on the floor (What kind of TEFL conference is it when no one’s allowed to sit on the floor???) and lecture us on how we are not allowed to ‘reserve’ seats by putting our belongings on them. James, Mike and I simply kept our heads down and hoped that she wouldn’t notice that the 3 of us were sharing 2 seats…
-honey
Buddhi is that part of your mind that can learn and is taught.. the knowing part of your mind.
In front is the trolley with stationery.
Those who protested were reduced to nothing.
Behind Barcia, Red Bull KTM’s Ken Roczen, of Murrieta, Calif., assumed the second-place position with Monster Energy/Pro Circuit/Kawasaki’s Blake Baggett, of Grand Terrance, Calif., in tow, where they would finish.
CD rip and vinyl rip, yo.
4 thermodynamics
Here are a few pictures of the event...
To achieve food security, Schuurs and Unity Governor, Taban Deng, believe that large-scale industrial agriculture projects (such as that of Concord) are the answer, as opposed to smallholder farming and pastoralism in Unity State. This skepticism is due to the widely held misconception that pastoralists are solely concerned with their cattle. While agriculture is not as central to pastoralist communities as with agriculturalist communities, family farms that pastoralist communities maintain with their cattle are crucial to local food security.
Euphoria at getting a tax refund, which lasts until you realize that it was your money to start with.
"Oh Fran, when did you get so wise?" I told her while sobbing.
I knew that I wanted to surround the bird stamp in flowers and the best way to achieve that was patterned paper. Using Basic Grey's Konnichiwa, I was able to add all of the roses in the background.
To Make the White Chocolate Whipped Cream:
We unfortunately live in a world where people place importance on material things. But should we? Brian McClure shows us what this obsession can do in his imaginative and inspirational children’s book “The Bubble”.
Ricotta Cream Cheese Frosting :
A French meringue is the simplest meringue; it is made by beating sugar into egg whites until stiff and fluffy.
One final note before we move on: while the narrator of The Ipcress File is never named, his eventual christening as Harry Palmer is presaged in the novel. Early on, for some reason someone hails him as "Harry", to which our narrator responds, "Now my name isn't Harry, but in this business it's hard to remember whether it ever had been". Maybe it had, maybe it hadn't; but one thing's for sure: for many people, it soon would be...
You know that feeling you get when you meet a celebrity? You get tongue-tied, you don’t know what to say, you don’t know if the words that come out of your mouth will be adequate enough for the CELEBRITIY (that is how you idolize the word in your mind.). You aren’t sure if the CELEBRITIY even wants to talk to you. Why would the CELEBRITIY want to talk to you, a simple commoner? A nobody?
So, ramble on over to Stephanie,whom I have known since I was only a few months old. We have been side by side ever since, regardless of the miles that separate us. From popcorn snacks sitting under the sink as roly poly babies to a shared margarita, we have forged a deep bond!
wing flutter
Its seems that the injury sustained by Nania-Williams is more serious and will rule him out for at least three weeks of rugby with an injury to the groin which has effected him in the past.
9) Last but not least try to stay calm. Cellulite builds up when the muscles are tense. Again yoga is good in this area. The discipline helps in our breathing, stretching and overall relaxation.
Members Show of Works on Paper.
The book is arranged in alphabetical order (though split into savoury and sweet), which I find irksome in this sort of book – I would much rather the dishes were arranged by region. Having said that, I probably would then have focused on SE Asia, and never noticed the aforementioned Uruguayan treat. In any case there are two separate indexes, one by country and the other by type of dish.
“They were expecting big things from me, but no worries, I’ll make it happen at the next level,” he said.
7. Black Salt is made in India by mixing salt water with harad seeds. The mixture is left to evaporate leaving behind black lumps of salt. When the salt is ground, the resulting powder is pink (as can be seen in the image above).
I do invite you to pass by for tea, or any other activities you would find entertaining. Even if you ignore me, a loving flirt, I will keep an extra eye on your activities here in Denmark, so do not mind to make a scene every now and then..
This is going to be a very quick and to the point review...
Custard:
Well, somebody had to do the chores, like organising the calendar, making contacts, blog and tweet, and that was me, Mimyo. Byul.org (모임 별) willingly did the design for the artist images. All the participants, Curly Sol (my label) and PDH have helped a lot in making decisions, which might be difficult when you have many people joining in. Apart that, music was done by respective artists and it was a work for all of us.
The evening was entitled "Red", the glowing colour in which the visitor is immersed when inside the giant inflatable form. The minimal and reduced sounds and vibrations of the music created an experience for the visitor, much in the same way the exhibition itself does with its simplified colours and forms - the impact of both Hawtin's music and Kapoor's work provoke perhaps a universal, primordial reaction in the spectator. A light show also linked the sounds of the music with the tangible forms of the sculpture.
Finally, let’s consider the ‘policy prescription’ of this rudimentary theory.
It’s an age-old question, one that haunts every undergraduate across the globe: What do I major in?
Sorry about the lateness of it all. Tuesday WAS a super fun day. But I was dying in the afternoon. I got the flu. It wasn't food poisoning like I first though. I stayed home and cleaned all morning long, met the girls at Olive Garden, played 3 rounds of Laser tag, then got the kids from the bus. And went to the park afterwords. Kim brought us Sonic, and after an hour at the park, I was puking behind the trash can before going home. And I don't remember much else from the day. It was BAD. Diarrhea and vomiting... Yeah, that was my day... And evening. SO bad!
“I Pray in Faith”
Franco, mostly we see him much older, nice. Another
I have to get my cardo back in shape, strengthen and condition my legs, and be in decent shape to enjoy every moment of the opportunity presented by a wedding DJ. And losing the tummy along the way – well I’m not going to say looking good for my wife doesn’t have it’s perks.
I worry (a lot) about what people think about my weight. Do they wonder if I just don't care? Do they feel sorry for me & think, 'aww, such a pretty face, shame she can't lose 20 lbs'? I worry that whatever else I succeed at, my inability to maintain a single digit size overshadows it. A very smart girl I work with asked me one day why I care so much about my weight. I told her that I always feel like the fattest girl in fat town. When I meet for all of my various running clubs, or a fancy, schmancy yoga class, I always feel like the fattest girl there. So my friend asked, "Yes, but are you the worst one there?" Me, "No". Her, "Then why do you care?" Touche.
And he asks you where you've been, you tell him who you've seen
I didn't realise it at the time but I had competition. Her ex was competing for her affections too - and he brought flowers as well.
No amount of planning can deal with even the state's current overpopulation, let alone an additional 5 to 10 million. The best that planners can do under these circumstances is forcing greater density -- squeezing ever-greater numbers into the same space. More high rise Tokyo-style dwellings. More people commuting in the kind of mass transit cattle cars typical of New York and Boston. Greenhut thinks this will enable immigrants to "pursue their dreams."
Pay $1, get back $1 RR
But then, I’m not an average reader in any sense. And if you were wondering why I love Smashwords more than Amazon (hence KDP Select won’t see me at this time), well…
For Nicholas, He was a man
It doesn't often snow here in western Washington state. We have a very mild climate considering how far north we actually are. But for the past 3 or 4 days it has been snowing almost constantly. Soft, tiny, downy white flakes of snow. Once even big poofy flakes of snow.
Stop It Now! Helpline: Child Sexual Abuse and Pornography
Unable to get internet access or charge their IPhones and Blackberry’s, devastated citizens drove for up to 5 miles to find the nearest Starbucks or Barnes & Noble, and then had to fight unruly crowds, as bored middle aged suburbanites jostled with one another for a seat near an outlet.
and now for the Quirky Crafts Team:
A couple of weeks ago one of the Fiskateers, posted on the message board that she was looking for some scrapbookers who would create layouts with her sketches before the date that she planned to post the sketch. Her goal was to be able to show samples of how other people used her sketch. I decided to email her as I had just done a few sketches and decided that I really like doing them. It keeps my scrapping new and different. I was getting into a rut with how my pages were layed out. Now I am using different layouts and more patterned paper. Hoping that doing the sketchs helps me out in several ways.
The clothes are glued onto an acetate sheet fixed to cover the front of the card, and the paper dolls glued to the background beneath. When the card is closed, the dolls are dressed, but open the acetate and the clothes disappear :-).
Learning Resources announces the sponsorship of a teacher grant hosted by WeAreTeachers. To apply, teachers must answer this question: “How would you use portable interactive technology to create collaborative lessons?” After the application process concludes, educators can invite colleagues to vote for their favorite lesson ideas. Each of the three top vote getters will win a set of three now!Boards and three GeoSafari Tuff Cams, a prize package valued at $2,000. Additionally, two merit-based winners selected by a panel of teachers will each win one now!Board and one GeoSafari Tuff Cam, a total value of $700. Teachers can apply for the
Dry scallops are all wild and natural. They are not treated with any chemicals whatsoever. They are harvested directly from the ocean, shucked on deck, then immediately frozen on the boat to capture their quality. Dry scallops caramelize naturally during cooking to a golden brown color that is very attractive when serving. And, as you might have guessed, there is no cost-added water weight with dry scallops. Dry scallops generally have a natural vanilla color.
I am afraid to take another foster placement because I am sick. That also devastates me.
5) The car exploding
Anyways, Matt has just written a research paper quoting anonymous Taliban commanders with approx 100-125 soldiers under their command and yet with first hand knowledge of Quetta Shura and all the inside workings. Matt has further shared what is in public knowledge and open facts. All intelligence agencies keep a contact with all groups in the world and that is something well understandable. Even he accept the fact when he says that Pakistan sabotaged the American effort to reach out to some Taliban commanders to start a reconciliation talks i.e Mullah Baradaar. So when CIA can do it, why not ISI when our country future is at stake here?
VET LADY: No. Good day sir.
Our guide took us down into the city and began a very interesting tour of the city that the Spanish conquistadors never found. Most people have seen pictures of Machu Picchu, whether it’s in travel brochures, on TV documentaries, or just from friends who’ve been. Well one thing you don’t get from a 2D image is the ‘how’ and ‘why’ behind it. Call me a geek, but this stuff fascinated me!
I’ve been thinking of tomato rice lately. Back in university days, my friends and I used to dine in at a stall near the hostel. A Malay uncle was selling nasi tomato (tomato rice) there. His tomato rice was served with a chicken drumstick and few slices of cucumber. It was the only tomato rice I tried.
So now I'm trying to figure out what to wear. And the above is the stuffed sausage option. Ignore the shoes because they have definitely got to go. And the bare legs are also a no go. But unfortunately the shirt's no good as well.
Nøgne Ø Imperial Stout – Norway – 9.0% ABV
A computer image (displayed, not for hi-res printing) typically has 72 pixels per inch. Is that number familiar? It should be if you are serious about this publishing lark. There are 72 points to an inch. Coincidence? No.
So, I guess this means you're not considering homeschooling this year?
Fleas are jumpin and the nettles are high !!!! Lol !
15. Black Buddafly (prod Kingdom)
I have an awesome group of writers that I talk to day and they keep me inspired. The author that made me inspired me is Charlaine Harris. After I read her Sookie Stackhouse novels, I knew that I wanted to write for a living!
Saturday morning I had a shoot, with little Clara and her parents. I took several shots and have narrowed the finalists down to 130 of them. Um, yeah, I have some further narrowing down to do. Seriously though, we had a good time and that family is ridiculously good looking.
Relieved of the exaustion that would have been packed into the week leading up to tour we let our worries melt and fully embraced the Christmas spirit. We had another potluck at the warehouse and exchaged gifts under the physcadelic pine tree. The greatest gift truely came from above. Joe weaseled us 5 days to record in a church a mile away from our place. Our friends Jess and Josh run a non-profit rock school out of one of the rooms and arranged for us to record in the chapel. It snowed the day after Christmas. The next morning we packed up half of the studio into our van and drove it over to the church. We shoveled out a parking space and loaded in. The studio was set up in an extra room on the second floor. Transporting the tape machine would have messed up it's calibration and broke our backs so we decided to go digital for this session. This was also the quicker and more convenient option. Day one was spent getting the most glorious drum sounds we have ever heard. Tank and his kit were set up in directly in the center of the room. Stained glass windows cast colored light across them. It was dead silent in the church except for the sound of Tank's drums echoing through every room. In another effort to save time and to ressurect a live feeling that could not be found on some of the first sessions's recordings we would track the bass right along with the drums and ditch the click track. For this we used my usual bass set-up; An Acoustic 450 head and a Peavey 2x15 cabinet. We stuck this in a side room to give it a little bit of isolation and also ran a direct line into the computer. It sounded like it always does and we were happy with that.
KILLJOY from Killjoy
You'd think the dealerships would be mortified at allowing their client's second most important asset to be stolen while in their care, and do everything possible to ensure they - that's the clients - don't suffer any financial loss as a result. But you'd very likely be wrong.
K: Coffeeshop
In shrinking markets, the value of a product doesn’t decline only the number of people who are interested in the product. So the answer cannot be a price reduction strategy. Instead, the answer lies in exploring the value offered by products to the customer base. If value is understood, then value-add elements can be created. If these elements are effective, an appropriate pricing structure can be developed to drive higher revenues from existing customers.
follows the incident of “The Raising of Lazarus” (John 11:1-44).
Cinderella Strong by August McLaughlin: The multi-talented August takes a look at the Cinderella story from the perspective that it is actually a metaphor. It is a neat take on the story and at the end she shares the music video for her song, “Cinderella.”
Steve and Guy were both thrilled at the numbers who turned out at each venue and are confident that, not only does the thing have a strong future but it also may need a bigger home if the exercise is to be repeated. No one, least of all the owners want to have punters waiting too long to get their beers from the bar and plans are already written to take the event off-site to a larger venue so that more are able to attend and more beers and brewers can showcase their talents.
Danielle was formally diagnosed on June 21, 2010 with Stage 4 Clear Cell Sarcoma. Until this family's crisis, Danielle had promising field hockey career and is still getting recruit inquiries from college coaches. Instead of scheduling those coaches' visits, Danielle received 30 rounds of external radiation and 8 rounds of Chemotherapy. The worst news for Danielle and her family was that her right lung must be removed along with right chest wall. She also had Brachy Therapy (internal radiation beads).
Of the joy in my soul
Even before I knew that the prompt was to be Relative, I'd been thinking about family. A couple days ago, I started pooling photos into a "Siblings" album. I have quite a few siblings. My lil sis and I share the same mother and father, but there were also half brothers, half sisters, step brothers and a step sister. Two half brothers are no longer with us. Donnie was the baby. He passed on very young from Leukemia. I have such strong memories of those last days with him. He didn't live with us, but when he became so ill, Dad brought the boys over more often. I remember the bruises on his little arms. I asked grandma why he had so many and heard the word "transfusions" for the first time. He was so sweet, and his journey in this life was too short. I imagined arms of ancestors wide open, waiting for him. I did wonder if I'd prayed harder, would God have let him stay. I was ten years old.
Dear Heavenly Father, I thank You for the privilege and opportunity to put Your Word to work and watch it produce results. Today, I reaffirm that all I am, and all I have are Yours forever, and I will forever worship You with the very best of my substance as a token of my gratitude to You, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
makes 14+ depending on how fat you make them.
William Lane Craig
I love interiors, obviously. I could look at shelter mags and blogs all the day long. However, I have always sort of noticed that I am not particularly a "kitchen person." Very rarely am I one to rave about a kitch or rail against it. I just don't care as much about kitchens as other things. I also have no idea what I would even think to pick if I could design my own. Weird, right?
The immediate impact means dozens of Christian churches will have to find a new place to hold services.
be peeved when it gets banged up.
I walked up one step and behind me I heard his spit hit the ground on the step below, followed by “Pah! Falasteen!”
The dark side of the moon I’m talking about is much more personal. Consider this fair warning that the following is not all rainbows and unicorns and although Fletch is one of the funniest movies ever (at least in terms of movie lines), I don’t find this story funny at all. In fact, I’d like to file a complaint with somebody or at least get a free toaster for my troubles.
The appearance of the fields with their lack of snow may indicate spring, but the colours prove otherwise. There is no hint of green yet, the nights are still quite cold and the ground has not warmed enough to encourage the tree buds to swell or the dandelions to push forth. The scenery remains grey, beige, old gold, with shrinking patches of bright white as the snow retreats before the lengthening daylight and increasing warmth.
“Even the most disinterested act of speech, such as naming the animals, is not an act of unmotivated reason; it is important to know one animal from the other, since some may be dangerous, others may be tasty, while still others may strike the human perceiver as amusing or awe-inspiring or potentially useful. To generalize: what A says about B always tells you something about A….To what extent is speech revelatory, to what extent obfuscating? These difficulties, which adhere even to the relatively disinterested uses of speech (like naming the animals), become magnified when reason’s view of the world is colored by the presence of desires and passions” (p. 77-8). Truthful naming, then, works to rightly order our existence according to God’s view of the world, instead of fallen man’s lustful desires to possess and control.
It’s always a challenge for me to preach about the Resurrection of Jesus. It is the central truth of our faith. Jesus physically rose from death; you either believe it or you don’t. In the past I have offered many facts and logical arguments that tell us it is reasonable to believe it. But this year I want to look at the difference it makes in our lives. It makes a huge difference in eternity, of course – the difference between heaven and hell. But it starts to make a difference right now, in the choices we make, and in how we deal with disappoint and grief here in this life.
Have a fun weekend. Mine is all family stuff. My oldest turns 32 tomorrow. The Wusband is in for the weekend.
To build on youthful promise is not new at Arsenal. In the past five or six seasons there have been two where the squad might have made the step up from being good to great. They were not able to do so for a myriad of reasons. This time the manager has, I think, a better blend of youth and experience but more importantly a set of players who do not seem to sulk, particularly experienced professionals who are willing to drive teammates on to achieve something.
On my trip home this year Middelvlei was on the list to visit. My cousin had discovered online that they do a Boerebraai (Farmers BBQ) with all the traditional South African foods. She didn't have to convince me twice and we immediately made our reservations and counted down the days.
2 Tbsp. baking powder
Dance With Me to the End of Love, Yu Lik Wai, Hong Kong. Science Fiction, 30 min.
The pledge by Irish and British unions to reach U.S. workers with the story of the injustice being carried out against the Cuban Five resulted in a California meeting organized by the Service Employees Union last August that featured the retired UNITE the UNION leader Tony Woodley, and another meeting on March 10 in Chicago.
I did a little final assembly, adding Papertrey buttons, tied twine and Studio Calico wood asterisks to the card fronts.
Now that the ice cream parlor has opened, there are 14 more people who have jobs. And if it wasn't for inexcusable stupidity they could have had jobs 2 years ago.
These questions were fun to answer, but I remained skeptical they’d lead to anything I’d be willing to stand up in a white dress and declare. However, after a bit of pen nibbling and a lot of luke-warm tea, I did in fact transform them into a first draft:
Βλέπετε οὖν πῶς ἀκριβῶς περιπατεῖτε, μὴ ὡς ἄσοφοι, ἀλλ᾿ ὡς σοφοί, ἐξαγοραζόμενοι τὸν αιρόν, ὅτι αἱ ἡμέραι πονηραί εἰσι. διὰ τοῦτο μὴ γίνεσθε ἄφρονες, ἀλλὰ συνιέντες τί τὸ θέλημα τοῦ υρίου. καὶ μὴ μεθύσκεσθε οἴνῳ, ἐν ᾧ ἐστιν ἀσωτία, ἀλλὰ πληροῦσθε ἐν Πνεύματι, λαλοῦντες ἑαυτοῖς ψαλμοῖς καὶ ὕμνοις καὶ ᾠδαῖς πνευματικαῖς, ᾄδοντες καὶ ψάλλοντες ἐν τῇ καρδίᾳ ὑμῶν τῷ Κυρίῳ, εὐχαριστοῦντες πάντοτε ὑπὲρ πάντων ἐν ὀνόματι τοῦ Κυρίου ἡμῶν ᾿Ιησοῦ Χριστοῦ τῷ Θεῷ καὶ πατρί. ῾Υποτασσόμενοι ἀλλήλοις ἐν φόβῳ Χριστοῦ. (Ephesians 5:15-21 GNT)
Another anime revolves around Koichi Sakakibara who had to start school in class 3-3 late due to a lung problem that resulted in him being hospitalized. When he is able to go to school he sees a mysterious girl named Mei Misaki who to every other student doesn’t exist. Sakakibara is curious about the treatment and behavior towards Misaki but all the student of class 3-3 don’t say anything about Misaki. Mei Misaki wears an eye patch over her right eye and has an ability to see the color of a dead person. Unfortunately Sakakibara becomes friend with Misaki and breaks the rule protecting class 3-3 from a horrific curse.
Nature walks, Indian mounds, forts and gardens we visited when I was a kid: 547
Levin has no fear of the NEA or any other teachers' unions, is not afraid to step on toes, and doesn't give a damn what the media thinks of him. Give him Education with the instructions of cleaning house, fixing the problem.
Najib’s speech was read out by his deputy, Tan Sri Muhyiddin Yassin.
At today’s EETimes Virtual SoC event Marc Greenberg from Cadence pulled back the veil on DDR4 a bit more. Here’s what he had to say.
Then today I saw something else that made smoke and fire shoot out of my ears and nostils like some crazed cartoon character. I had just dropped the kids off at school and was driving through a nice part of downtown Norfolk, VA, when I saw a woman walking with a little girl who was probably about four or five. The woman was dressed in a business suit, she was holding the child's hand, and everything seemed so normal they almost didn't even register in my brain. Until I stopped at a red light and looked at the child. On the back of her shirt was the word "Bootylicious", with an arrow pointing down toward her rear end. I was hoping that maybe I was losing my mind, I had forgotten how to read, or maybe I was going blind and didn't see the words clearly, but no, I was right upon taking a second look.
a book + a small toy + three eggs filled with candy + chocolate bunny
Craves the chemicals that fill the cracks in his brain
Though our love story took many crazy paths before we married, we took that next step knowing we wanted to be with each other for the rest of our days. In the past seven years we've had two amazing daughters, a number of wild adventures, and more inside jokes than we can count.
Wendy Toliver - The Secret Life of the Teenage Siren
I must make my book just like it. But I'll blend all the other stuff I already thought up, too.
My life hidden with Christ in God! Amen!
Today's card I am sharing with you uses the image Koala Hug Tilda. This is the Special Edition Tilda that is a tribute to saving the Koala Bears in Australia. Here is a pic.
I had a fun and mostly carefree childhood. I always had the good fortune of having great friends no matter where we lived. My friend Darlene when I stayed with my grandparents, Cynthia & my beloved Scotty at our first house in SJC and then Michelle, Asha, John and many more off of Ortega Highway. And when I wasn't playing with friends and came to work with my Mom, SJC was a much safer place. I could walk to the library alone and spend hours reading. I could walk down to the candy store this little old lady ran and get some cheap treats. Go to the butcher shop for the worlds best beef jerky. I knew the owners of every business around the mission in San Juan and could spend hours looking over the cat merchandise, beads, or doll house miniatures.
I just love the rose and it wasn't very difficult. But they do take time. I can't imagine sitting all day making roses. I love the die cuts too. The original left the leave die cuts white but I colored mine green. I thin it set everything off really nicely. One last pic.
It seems Pound was even more lost than the other members of the Lost Generation who he influenced. The American living in Britain turned away from capitalism in disgust at the loss of life in the First World War only to embrace another killing machine, that of fascism and the anti semitism that swept Europe in the 1930s and 1940s. He remains a controversial figure today.
My French Cajun aunts and cousins served sausage and chicken gumbo regularly, it was cheap, healthy, wholesome for the children. Chickens could be had for $.29 a pound, and Savoie's or Richard's pork sausage was cheap and always on sale. Add a handful of mirepoix, a little shortening and flour for the roux, some white rice, and you had a delicious, nutritious, filling, hot meal for your husband and 9 children!
As he prepares for his sophomore year, Eric is more committed to his major field of study, biology. He plans to first earn his B.S. Biology and then pursue graduate studies with a concentration in Marine Biology. Eric says that a fascination with marine life, a desire to explore the unknown, and endless curiosity are driving his academic ambitions. He adds that he feels a need, “to contribute something useful to society in the way of science or medicine in my discoveries.”
Republicans claims that the U. S. corporate tax rate is higher than all other countries in the world. To that, I say, when some of our oil companies and other companies like General Electric have an effective tax rate of 0%, it does not matter what the statutory tax rate is.
Amy is the older sister and a full time family law attorney. She loves her 2 sons and nephew, dogs, volunteering at the Bangor Humane Society, being outdoors when it’s nice outside and indoors when it’s not.
“Queen Sorceress Olamna makes her way down the mountain My Lord, she shall intercept Agatha and her Party in two to three days I’d say” speaks one of the two Shadow Wizards, this one marked by an Eye Patch… Otherwise King Eterr could never tell the two apart.
What if people click on me, an icon of God, an get a broken link? Or you?
...but I cabn't post. Because I hab a bad cod. And I cabn't breathe.
Maybe that's because I see this house daily and fantasize about going hog wild ripping lights down from its eaves. Maybe it's because the pattern blinked out by the flashing snowflakes in the trees, net lights draped across the lawn and bulbs nailed to the roof top give the dog the shits. Or maybe it's because EVERY YEAR these psychos put up more lights and more craziness in order to compete with these other maniacs to win the neighborhood's apparently coveted Best Lights Display award based on votes from my more annoying neighbors.
Every inhalation
Hi. I’m Chris. I promise.
and Your refusal to bow to worldly temptations,
Here's to Rotten Rejections!
Also related to the cats: this morning as I was unloading groceries (off due to President's Day, which RULES), Scamper streaked into the kitchen carrying something large and feathery in his mouth, which he deposited at my feet. It was a freshly dead bird, as limp as a ragdoll. I have to admit that I squeaked a little bit. Again, I remember reading somewhere that you're not supposed to make a big deal out of this but it is kind of a big deal when you are already slightly weirded out by bird germs (don't ask) and it's never happened to you before. I eventually swept the bird into a dustpan and deposited him in the garbage outside. Scamper -- that idiot -- keeps looking for it in the kitchen.
I want to remember the fear, I want to remember the promise, I want to remember the nights I wanted to curl up in a ball, I want to remember the people I’m not supposed to remember, I want to remember not knowing myself, I want to remember the moment I started to feel safe and like this life I’m leading is really mine. I’m going to be scared, I’m going to bruise my knees and not know how they got there, I’m going to try to fruitlessly forge a connection with someone who won’t ever get it, I’m going to lose the person that means the most to me and find my way back to them. I’m going to be a twentysomething because that’s what I am and all I know how to be. And you should too. You should love every single moment of this hot mess of a decade. Chances are you’ll miss it before you even get to say “I’m 30.”
It's summer time and it is time to get out the revealing clothes out.My Fav the tank top.Well there isn't much to say about them but they are very comfy.And it reveals all of my better qualities.You know the boobs.And pretty much gives a hint of the season which I love so much. summer.Well that's all for now and wear them in good health.
My mind was racing...who can I send to the hospital for the night? Will karma bite my ass hard for this? Do I care? I mean, I'm trying to get out of this date without being so in his face about it so that his friends don't think that he's a big(ger) loser than them. That makes me nice, right? Yes...that's what we're going with. In the end, I decided that no one would be taking a fake trip to the hospital, but that I would be getting a very urgent call of help from one of my best friends. At the end of the first intermission, when the laughing Accountant excused himself to go to the restroom, I texted my friend and told her to call me in about 5 minutes because I needed a rescue. As perfect as timing could be, my phone rang just as he returned to our seats.
Brigitta and Ondelle are caught in a dangerous feud between two factions of feral faeries whose leaders will stop at nothing to access what little sorcery Noe has left.
I tell you so affectionately. For the first four years after my conversion I made no progress, because I neglected the Bible. But when I regularly read on through the whole with reference to my own heart and soul, I directly made progress. Then my peace and joy continued more and more. Now I have been doing this for 47 years. I have read through the whole Bible about 100 times and I always find it fresh when I begin again. Thus my peace and joy have increased more and more. (76) He was seventy-one and he would live and read on for
See, she’s written a Young Adult romance novel. A romance novel where the two leads just happen to be female.
Beer Pairing: Barley Wine
Erin Brockovich is on another crusade to rid America of polluted water.
The novella begins with the announcement that the (supposedly real) Marquise of O-:
These are the people conscious and responsive to what is going on in America. They see the damages of inequality–they have done their homework. They know the root of the breakdown IS not and WERE not the results of the 2008 Presidential election, which immediately and quickly spurred protest with vitriol anti-government rhetoric.
The name Munnar is believed to mean “three rivers”, referring to the town’s strategic location at the confluence of the Madhurapuzha, Nallathanni and Kundaly rivers. The town has shared a strong cultural link with Tamil Nadu and over 70% of the population of the town being Tamils.
Fact is that Lazarus was probably very, very, very, miserable,…and very lonely,…(not to mention how bad his life STANK,…or the “maggots” that were, second by second CONSUMING WHAT WAS LEFT OF HIM!) in that cold, lonely, dark, stinking place the he was laying, WRAPPED UP (IN HIMSELF?) LIKE A MUMMY FROM HEAD TO TOE!,…(hey, I have felt that way in my life, too!!! and it sucked!!!)…
So someone tell me: Is Nostalgia Ventures following or breaking trademark law with the phrase “THE FIRST SUPERHERO” on the cover of their Doc Savage reprints? (This sounds like a job for those guys over at the “Law and the Multiverse” blog.)
Stand 10.C41
Finally we wish that everyone involved in this event will witness a wonder and create a wonder in their own ways to prove another time that ART is something very special and still incredibly powerful to move mountains and can reach places in other peoples’ hearts than anything else in this world, because it is pure love.
Ok, now I'm done!
QVC is heading to one of our old haunts, Beverly Hills, for its The Buzz on the Red Carpet – Live from L.A. broadcast.
Moreover, by respondent’s inaction to the court order in Civil Case No. B-259, he has very well violated his Attorney’s Oath to “obey the laws and legal orders of the duly constituted authorities.”
2 horse
So, if that doesn't get you excited ...
“Building?” I ask. “Oh, do you mean the garage?”
Luckshmi Sivalingam is a program officer in Grameen Foundation’s Solutions for the Poorest initiative, where she is managing a pilot program to expand income opportunities for the very poorest people in India.
WE’RE WITH YOU ALL THE WAY
So what am I doing by starting this blog? Killing two birds with one stone. How am I possibly going to do that? Write about every single thing I come across, be it an event or a book.Expect to see a lot of reviews from everything I’ve seen, done or heard. On top of developing my sense of what lifestyle truly is, I’m also doing something about my goal and making a difference in my life.
Geographical consolidation, in a nutshell, consists of forcing Muslims in Zone C to Zones A and B, and, eventually, Muslims in Zone B to Zone A. We note that Muslims in Zone C are, by definition, few and scattered. Furthermore, they will often be running catering businesses that serve the public in the area they live in, and that are open to being disrupted by anything from a brick through the plate glass front window to an arson attack staged in earnest. Restaurants tend to take a disproportionate fraction of their revenue on just a couple of days of the week, so disruption on these days would be the most obvious way of driving them out of the area in question. This could probably be done without actually having to hurt or kill anyone, which would be useful from a propaganda point of view.
“And when thy days be fulfilled, and thou shalt sleep with thy fathers, I will set up thy seed after thee, which shall proceed out of thy bowels, and I will establish thy kingdom. He shall build an house for my name, and I will stablish the throne of His Kingdom forever.”
I just used the avocado and honey mask and loved it. I'm not going to lie...I tasted it...I liked it. Not saying that I took a chip to the leftovers, but there is something to be said for tasty face masks.
The Set-Up – 3
Three skeletons lay there, one of which was a child’s. He reached out with a trembling hand and gently stroked their dried bones. One hand was coming out of the earth and on it, there was ring with a blue stone strikingly similar to the one hanging around his neck. He took the skeletal hand in his, very lightly, as to not shatter it to pieces, and waited, longing to feel it caressing his head one more time. Then he took the ring from his mother’s finger and put it on the string next to the other half.
Dabber : Pool, Silver, Snowcap, and Platinum Pearl - All by Ranger Ink
Every time I visit my parents we go to this Vietnamese restaurant. If you’re into fancy meals or ambiance try going into Seattle, but if you’re into authentic, affordable food, then this is the place for you. The summer rolls are fresher and bigger than any I’ve ever had, and the bowls of noodles come with every garnish you could ever want. In a city that’s usually cold and rainy, Janbo is warm and comfortable and there’s avocado milkshakes. Also, I’d be remiss if I didn’t mention the GIANT cream puffs they give you for FREE at the end of every meal. While there, my parents always run into someone they know, which is the tell tale sign of a good spot.
These were some of the other options I made for my Christmas card mingle Exchange. I finally decided whom I am sending what, now I have to make another card and I have to make 12 of that design for another exchange I am doing through our local Craft Store, The Scrapper's Cove (Here), a great place to shop and hang out!! The girls are so friendly there, it is like going home when you visit.
15. Soul Purpose 5.10 (58/69)
“The only exceptional case in this case is that he is a friend of the Conservatives. Why is (Harper) not tough on crime when it comes to his Conservative cronies.”
The men had just sung the “Star Spangled Banner,” according to the father of one of the singers, when they prepared to leave.
That sums it up quite well. Speaking of explosive hop experiences, am I right that the bottle neck label this year is a little different, more of a fireworks of flavor feel to it?
My friend.
I want to publicly thank Wendi Aarons and Jennifer Sutton for the awesome job they did in producing this show and for their incredible contributions on stage. They are two smart, funny, wonderful women. And I'd also like to thank my sisters in writing, all the multi-talented and lovely LTYM cast members. How about we take this show on the road, girls?
The latest on was leaked last night, and you impatient types can download it from the source link. It brings two sets of new features; when looking at the “My Apps” page you now get a tabbed experience, much like you have in other parts of the market. By swiping left or right you can switch between a My Apps page that breaks apps up into Update and Installed, or the new “All” page, which seems to show not only purchased apps, but also free apps that you installed at one time (or on a previous phone) but may not have installed presently.
An elderly woman died in a small town just down the road last week.
“It was a tough job that required a lot of systems engineering, and complicated communication between many people to ensure that the systems all worked together. In the end, we built three payloads and had over 20 launches.” Corley adds that the job was unique as well as challenging, as recovery crews often traveled through rough terrain and had to search for rogue pieces of equipment that might have broken off.
if your friends had to describe you in one word, what would it be?
Sweet Virginia – Rolling Stones
“Real in Rio” from Rio
When I returned from that trip I continued to feel caught up in the reverie of their love and decided I was going to go out and find LOVE, come hell or high water. Coincidently, throughout the area that I lived in (a very open, country type area, out in the sticks) there were signs tacked up on just about every telephone pole, backside of fences, street sign posts, etc. that advertised for a dating service, literally trying to recruit people from my little neck of the woods. I tried to ignore it, but decided maybe I could just check into it. Long story short, much to my embarrassment, I am still paying $100 a month to belong to a dating service I have not scored one date from......please, laugh along with me because that is all I can do....laugh....(I'm unemployed.....so, $100 a month is a lot of money), I signed an 18 month payment plan contract....(I was unemployed at the time, but the girl 'pulled some strings to get me signed up'). The services they offer aside, it was a rookie move brought on by not wanting to spend another Christmas alone.....(I'm making efforts to get out of the contract, but I don't think I can)
To give a brief introduction:
So we turned half of the zucchini into a dinner for four. My visiting friends got busy grating zucchini and onion which they mixed with pancake mix to turn into truly amazing zucchini pancakes. Meanwhile, my boyfriend sauteed zucchini and threw in a touch of Ginger People's Ginger Jalapeño Spicy Dip. With just enough flavor and kick to make it better than the average hot sauce, we've been putting it on everything and still have half a bottle left!
While the brilliant title track remains the album's other best-known song, each cut on I Never Loved a Man is touched by greatness; covers of Ray Charles' "Drown in My Own Tears" and Sam Cooke's "Good Times" and "A Change Is Gonna Come" are on par with the original recordings, while Aretha's own contributions -- "Don't Let Me Lose This Dream," "Baby, Baby, Baby," "Save Me," and "Dr. Feelgood (Love Is a Serious Business)" -- are perfectly at home in such lofty company. A soul landmark.
With the star designated "a," its sixth planet is called Gliese 581g.
Using tropes is related as much to our individual style as our premise and characters are, so it's not easily buttonholed. In my experience my use of them developed as part of my world building.
I do not deny the precious results of peace, I see populous cities
On February 16, 1947, Thomas Watson Brown, a white cab driver, picked up a black man on Markley Street in Greenville, South Carolina. Brown was later found half-dead, his taxi driven off the road in rural Pickens County. He had been beaten, robbed, and stabbed three times.
The 3D Special “on ice” was very enjoyable. And it had the best joke: “I think the Internet message boards used to be a lot funnier 10 years ago and I’ve sort of stopped reading their new posts.” Every episode we watch (and I admit we don’t always watch the new ones) is still damned funny.
GSM is another story. GSM is a world wide standard that was originally developed for Europe. AT&T and T-Mobile adopted this technology in the US. What’s special about GSM phones is that they use a removable SIM (Subscriber identity Module) card that can be swapped out to work on another network. If you have service in the United States but make frequent trips to Europe, you can buy a replacement SIM card that works with the cell phone network in the countries you are visiting. When you get back just replace your SIM card with the original and you are back in business on your regular network.
After some time, this vision faded away and I seemed to be still once more. New lines and patterns began to appear, changing shapes and morphing into new geometries. I began to get excited that I might, at last, see some of the spectacular and incredibly beautiful light shows that I had always heard about. I knew that these effects are often the least important of the types of vision experiences one has in Ayahuasca and other entheogenic experiences, but I still wanted to see them, My entire career has been as a digital television artist, working with and creating visual special effects, so I had a particular interest in this aspect of the vision experience.
Dad: Getting bullied online? What kind of a vagina is this kid?
"This has been a landmark year for the Company following the sale of the free trade business whilst also navigating a particularly difficult set of trading conditions.
1/4 cup organic granola
The next day we sat for half the day waiting for the creepy gnome to show up. I was about to start up a game of dice when the group announced that they were tired of waiting and elected the rest of us to go out to the temple ourselves. Since I was bored to tears, I readily agreed to go. The walk to the temple was scenic and forested, rather nice I would say if I were a druid but I’m not so bleh. As we traveled we came upon three massive sized bears. Who lets these things get so big? I mean really. Is it truly necessary? We started to debate how to deal with the bears when I heard the faint sounds of someone casting a spell off to our left. I was about to say “Someone is here,” when the dead-wannabe necro threw a fireball at the bears. Sigh, I guess we are fighting. Fighting bears.
The man spends his first three years in office short circuiting and corrupting normal market functionality, and now that it’s reelection time he gets all concerned about "the way the market should work." Fabulous.
This was a “grin and bear it” kind of day in the stock market for yours truly. The morning started, appropriately enough, with my only short position ($MCD) as the lone stock in my entire portfolio in the black. I promptly cut my position in half 10 minutes into the session, taking a small loss and lowering my exposure.
Tuesday -- Session with my trainer
Region: California, USA
There is a bewildering array of VPN protocols, from PPTP to IPSec to OpenVPN. A good VPN provider should offer you a choice, so that you can connect with a variety of devices based on which protocol each of them supports. In the case of my iPhone, I connect using PPTP, which is less secure but easy to use and available on the iPhone. For my Linux laptop, I use OpenVPN, which is both very secure and relatively easy to use but not always available on every platform. My personal provider is Ace VPN, but a quick Google search should allow you to shop around for a provider that suits you. One thing to look for before you subscribe is clear instructions on how to install and configure the necessary software.
My mom loves me. I don’t know if she always likes me or understands me, but I know she loves me.
Note: If you have problems linking your photo (especially from SCS), try entering the link to your card, then choosing From File instead of From Web. Then just browse to where your picture is saved on your computer to get your thumbnail.
mountains and sea?
Muhyiddin said in Asean’s 45-year history, the regional organisation has evolved from practising preventive policies to constructive ones.
Sally's meal was fairly designed for this beer: tandoori chicken, made on the grill, along with grilled asparagus, brushed with a vinegar sauce. On the side, a string bean salad with chopped hazelnuts. Good stuff.
But it looked like quite a fight.
Let’s start with a visual.
I had to join the circle and once the glue for that had dried, the shaped piece was glued on top.
from school to home and then everyone simultaneously volunteers to donate
When me and hubby had barely finished she took our plates and then never came back for the other plates. The only words she said to us were, “Are these plates finished with”.
69. Grendel: John Champlin Gardner
He certainly wasn't lying when he said this was a stellar patch! Numbered 25/50, this two-color patch features two awesome rows of stitching and a BIG patch piece that's trying to escape the card. I absolutely love the name of this set from Panini Zenith Hockey: Gifted Grinders. I mean, I hate when the term grinder is used in baseball for absolutely replaceable (and usually tiny and white) players like Adam Kennedy, but I understand its place in hockey, and Getzlaf is not only a supremely talented top-line center, but can also grind it out with the best of them.
2) Passport which must be valid at least 6 months (original and photocopy the main front pages - the ones with your details and signature)
All my life I’ve been in pretty good shape, but I didn’t start working out until college. I liked the way lifting weights helped turn my skinny body into a stronger, more muscular shape. In the six months before I got pregnant, I was working out with a trainer a couple times a week, doing a couple days of cardio, and eating pretty clean.
Here’s the thing. Far to0 many of you have IT (your business, your dream, your future) stuck in a box! And this has got you behind. You’ve created a nice little mental and physical container to put your business in. Because of this….your business is not growing, not thriving, not staying fit, firm, and flexible. It’s not progressing with the times and technology. Heck, sometimes it’s not even covered. However, it IS restricted, stifled, practically sufficating (and so are you). It’s gotten fat and flabby and stuck inside this box where it can’t get out to soar successfully.
May 9 1863 ... at 2 PM arrived at 21 mile house - got dirty dinner, served up in dirty manner by Miss Maggie Tennant in a dirty dress & frowsy hair - knew me - Had quite a chat together - Took me into parlor - got me to write off the words of "Open thy lattice to me" for her - I rode on...
just wait until I assemble the final army…an army of me
I swear I sound like a broken record, but I am so behind. So SO behind. Especially at updating my photography blog. I fully intend on updating it, as well as my new brand, business cards, and website...and possibly a wedding show in January. I'm going to try my best to not let this blog take too much of a backseat, but it might for a little bit so I can get my photo biz refreshed. It means a lot to me :)
(Knowing the attributes of God + acknowledging the attributes of God in us = true worship)
I'm also a bit behind on catching up to all the A-Z'ers and on blog reading in general, so today's post is short and sweet. A few pics of my furkids.
~ On average, the moon rises about 50 minutes later each day. But near the time of the autumnal equinox, the moon rises only about 30 minutes later each day. Why? The reason is that the ecliptic – or path of the sun, moon and planets – makes a narrow angle with the evening horizon during the autumn months. The narrow angle of the ecliptic in on autumn evenings results in a shorter-than-usual rising time between successive moonrises around the time of the autumn full moons.
I don’t wear mine very often, because every woman will tell you they are uncomfortable as BLEEP, but I’m pretty sure every woman has at least one of these things. That’s why I called it the BFF. And FYI – it’s so not size dependent. I have friends who are size 4s that wear shapers.
I'm a face in the crowd, I'm a big city cat.
Imagining seafaring jackets with vintage navy-striped collars–away to sea! Playing with jewel tones in pastel, ink, colored pencil on Borden & Riley Paris Bleedproof #234.
ii) or a green lung disappears
12 - Alela Diane - White as Diamonds
I really hit a low.
There is a determined plan to end the use of energy resources that are being used today. Granted, these fuel sources will not last forever and the need for “alternate” sources is paramount. As is reported, we have, right here, enough known, accessible deposits to last at least 100 years.
Enough of pain
Question is....will anyone actually save my button and put it on their own blog?
Row 2-9- ch1, turn, sc in each.
Child Mortality Rates
Girls aren’t worth it.
The details:
So you may think; my daughter is not exposed to violence in our home she would never allow herself to be in that kind of relationship. Here is the problem with that theory; you have no control, or idea for that matter, just what kind of home your daughter's love interest grew up in. Maybe in his home mom getting a punch in the face was as common as please pass the butter. Your daughter doesn't know that either because even people who behave badly understand that they are socially deviant, it doesn't come up in conversation. So when your daughter receives her first exposure to a violent outburst it is quite likely that she will already be 'in love.' The sting will hurt worse but the apology will be more powerful , it will come with an overwhelming desire to rationalize in the name of preserving 'love.' There is an entire psychology that accompanies the victim, the abuser, their relationship and the family at large and I am not even going to pretend to understand it but I can tell you what my friend taught me...
I tried to tell the crowd that although he was my opponent, Sen. Obama was a decent family man, and an American patriot. But they just yelled he was "Black Irish" and should "go back to Belfast."
Plus it was M2′s birthday as well. We went to our usual birthday place, Red Lobster. So our waiter let us know that he was moving to another city up north. He has a degree in computer graphics and being closer to Northern Virginia would be better for his business. We let him know that we were moving as well or at least planning to. So upon inquiry, he mentioned that we are brave people to consider Pakistan. He said given whats happening “regarding Pakistan, Israel and Obama”, it’s a complicated situation. So on our way back, FJ postulated that the waiter may have thought we were from Palestine and had said “Palestine”. I said that the waiter did know we were talking about Pakistan, had said “Pakistan” and his reference to Obama and Israel perhaps meant that Israel keeps on making excuses about the supposed threat to its security based upon whats happening in Pakistan and other places. It’s funny that every day its Muslims that are getting killed in Pakistan but Israel uses vague threats to its security to continue occupation. I wonder if Netanyahu believes in God or justice. I believe there are a lot of good people who live in Israel. I don’t understand why they elect leaders like this. It makes me question their sincerity towards the peace process.
Ahhh…all those years ago, I thought oh yes – let’s do a corner fireplace and be all cool and different and uh...ANNOYING.
· Speak up
Actual FG: 1.010
They would cut off a piece and share it with guests and would all sit around talking and "chew the fat."
Arthur Joseph Jones, 37, Ossining, N.Y.
18. when i was in the third grade, i was tested for a gifted program. i did not make it in; i was lacking in library skills they said. my best friend made it though, and she went on to be in a different third grade class leaving me behind. i think about that sometimes, walking out of the school building feeling so sad and like a failure and it is one of the very few memories I have from that time.
Our friend Hugh Crawford collated Jamie Livingston’s photos and put them online. It is retroactive blog: a slow motion trip from the punk era New York, into the boom President Reagan 80s thru crack cocaine to Mayor Guiliani’s New York through the personal photographs of one man.
This morning, waking up, so many things were going through my mind. Thoughts of friends, my family, my boyfriend, and my life as a whole. Just recently, I started working again which makes me feel amazing in so many ways. I know it sounds crazy, but lately I have felt so incredibly blessed with so many things in my life. My friends are probably the best friends in the entire world. Being my age and going through what I have, my friends were not prepared to go through something of that magnitude. I understand that. But they stepped up and did what they had to do as friends to make me feel as comfortable as possible because in reality, I didn't want to feel like I was different or that they had to give me special treatment just because of my situation. I don't think I could have asked for a better group of friends. They are my angels.
One thing I have found in these books though, is that telling a story in the first person does limit you in terms of the language. I find sometimes that I can’t use certain words or phrases because the character telling the story just wouldn’t use them. And that can be a little constricting at times. I have to try to work around that by having other characters say what he wouldn’t!
Kanika studied African history at California State University, Sacramento. She also took a pottery class at CSUS from artist Ruth Rippon. "Pottery was really making cups and bowls and plates, but I wasn't doing that. I was doing this," she said, holding up an African-style mask. "I was trying to do this on the sly."
So when I heard the next song, it was almost unrecognizable, I had to search it out and put 2 and 2 together. It completely changes the feel of the song, and he did it so simply, so beautifully, it gives me goosebumps. Mad props to Matt Weddle from Obadiah Parker.
I don’t often go second-hand bookshopping because either I won’t find anything, or I’ll find a bunch of stuff I probably won’t ever read. It’s a bit of a novelty for me, only really doing it when I’m on holidays and come across a shop I’ll probably never go to again, or if there’s a particular occasion (sale/closing down) and the books are going dirt fucking cheap. Well, cheaper than normal.
Oh, depressing. Cathy and I went out to test-drive TDI Jettas today, then popped down to Devil's Den to sample Flying Fish's Belgian Mild, a second-runnings beer (off their Imperial Porter). It was good, full of flavor, herbal and fresh (and Cathy's Weed Brewing Shastafarian Porter was good too), but the bartender dissed it! Compared it unfavorably to Brooklyn Blunderbuss Old Ale. "A lot better than that stuff," he said. Now, he was good enough to offer a taster of the Blunderbuss, and it was good, but...come on. It's like comparing a dirt bike and a tank for cross-country performance.
We toasted in the new year with sparkling apple juice.
Bistro Duck w/ Mso & Spring Roll - May 20
When catalyzed with money, Governmentium becomes Administratium, an element that radiates just as much energy as Governmentium since it has half as many peons, but twice as many morons.
1/3 cup 100's & 1000's
“I haven’t seen you in weeks! You can see my new jeep.”
When you live in a rural community, there is no garbage person. One has to haul garbage to the nearest “transfer station,” known fondly to most city-dwellers as “the dump.”
Reading is private so if you stop reading a book, no-one knows. You won't be teased in the playground.
Card # 1396: Jered Weaver, 2011 Topps Update Gold US236, Los Angeles Angels (1396/2011)
But it was Michael's sense of place that really made his writing so important to me. When MJ wrote about a beer, he wrote about where it was brewed and where people drank it, the look of the walls and the lay of the land, why the town was there and who the brewer's father was.
Discovering beauty in a fallen tree.....
Below is an excerpt from his response to the furore over his advice that whites should avoid blacks
I did the right thing. I loved my job. I loved the company I worked for even though it was a tough place to work. And still it bit me in the butt.
The same problem arises when one thinks of adventuring. The entire world has been explored, there are no frontiers left to vanquish. A 12-year-old can see the streets of Katmandu on Google maps just as easy as anyone else. This last point about adventure is something that bothers me the most because I spent so much of my childhood out adventuring in other world through books or video games and even within my own mind when I’d create little realms in our backyard, or down by the creek surrounded by trees.
I am clueless.
Touring as a photographer with a band seems to me to be physically - and mentally - extremely tough. But is it something you would want to do more often regardless of that?
For me Christmas means home and family. Its a bit of a cliche but I love being inside warming up beside our open fire when its cold and windy outside. It's a day when we just get together and be with each other.
Department of Motor Vehicles in the USA.
Cleveland Cavaliers losing to the New
Now I can laugh with you, Peter. But I wasn’t laughing then. I mean, look at my name! A freakish superheroine and a fucking male outlaw combined. Can you blame me for having this little gender identity crisis?
Synchro Lessons = $200/year (goes HIGHER in a competition year, with gas, travel, hotels, meals & competition fees)
Where I got the book: Local library
Ink-Stampin Up garden green
This particular Saison is a play on the previous recipe. I have cut back the amount of Rye, subbing Grains Of Paradise for a more subtle spiciness. Going to keep the early additions Hallertau but the late additions are going to be some peachy citrusy Amarillo hops. I want to avoid the long wait to get this one to finish out. So I am going to start with the Wyeast Saison, after three days I am going to hit it with Wyeast Trappist High Gravity to dry it out. Thinking of setting aside some unfermented wort and aerating it heavily. Creating a super started for the finishing yeast. Anyone with yeast mixing experience, please chime in!
Were you really
The best part of the whole evening may have been the whole class wandering around the beer section. It was at this point, Lee was positive he had groupies, and he held court babbling about beer and whoring his Blog. The express line clerk sure looked a bit scared wondering where all these really drunk people came from who buy $10 bottles of beer.
Tripeo and the other bot towards the garage when
We finally made it to the renovated Balzac site, transformed from a fine dining restaurant to a gastro pub downstairs, and a more formal dining area upstairs.
care how much you know until they know how much you care.”
But things have finally come to a head as my sleep has been reduced and the quality has deteriorated, and I told Son that I need him to stay in his room, because it's better for his sleep. He definitely needs the sleep and in the early morning when he wakes up, he has a harder time falling back asleep. I want him to sleep all the way through, getting more solid sleep and resting more deeply. I explained it to him, promised him a prize if he could carry through, and basically explained what he needed to do.
I was curious about the 90 year-old so I viewed his profile and I noticed he had put up around 10 pictures and had a very long write-up about himself and what he was looking for. He stressed on how fit he was and how he exercised regularly. His profile seemed so eager and hopeful that it struck a cord in me. Here is a guy at 90 who is still out there looking for love like the rest of us.
So if any of that sounds interesting, come check us out at:
They have decided to try a treatment that has done fairly well in the past in which they do some injections into the bad area, and then do it again a month later. This has been successful in most cases like mine, though on occasion a third set of injections has been necessary. Hopefully it will work, otherwise I may be looking a a surgical approach, which I would rather not do, unless absolutely necessary. I am currently waiting for them to schedule the treatments.
Level 19: STR: +57, Increases your attack speed.
1 performing
My family and friends call me a hippie.
On Saturday, as we were arriving home I saw a UPS truck driving away from our house.
The Federal Housing Finance Agency directed Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac Thursday to align their guidelines for servicing delinquent mortgages. Previously, the government-sponsored enterprises maintained different requirements for how their mortgage servicers would treat these loans.
What I woulda liked to have read was something a whole lot more "concrete", like how did Markopoulos' "in camera editing" work, or just what exactly was PULL MY DAISY (which you'd never know was a neat li'l personal film dealing with the meeting of some of the bigger beats of the fifties narrated by the biggest one of 'em all!)...most of this reminds me of that old comedy gag from the twenties and thirties where the stereotypical fake intellectual black guy spouts loads of big words (some even with actual meaning!) at his audience of old black men in a meeting room who react in righteous "amens", when all the while what we ALL could use is some plain talk without the socia/political aspects as to what we are about to receive! I will say that reading something like Carl Linder's notes for his debut film THE DEVIL IS DEAD made for wonderful reading, but if someone had only bothered to give me a shot-by-shot like has been done with everything from UN CHIEN ANDALOU to SCORPIO RISING I sure woulda appreciated it especially since there's no way that I'm gonna be catching this on youtube any day soon. But I still am hoping.
DATE: THURSDAY, JANUARY 20, 2011
This is my menu and techniques:
This is a strong field, especially at a time period when the Republican Party is transitioning away from the old guard liberal establishment of Bush and McCain and Dole towards the new conservative talent of Paul Ryan and Bobby Jindhal and Sarah Palin and others. The GOP is at an odd place where the Reagan and conservative revolution generation is too old or too discredited and the new tea party generation is too young and untested- and yet a guy like Mitt Romney has a strong resume and background and talents that has enabled him to ably bridge this gap.
Your word this month - Milkshake
- Thank You's
We've reached that "major milestone" of "sleeping through night."
Other books that I have read on the topic and would recommend include:
The show is getting a little tired for me and should probably wrap up soon, but it is still really funny. Alec Baldwin is providing a virtuoso performance every week, which would be enough to watch, except there are plenty of other good things happening on the show.
This is a wholesome dish that does not require sides since we've already flavored it with some yummy stuff, but enjoying these with some dahi or yogurt takes them to the next level of bliss :)
So, lately I’ve been thinking about running quite a bit. I’m running the Historic Half Marathon in Fredericksburg, VA later this month and am hoping to get myself a ticket and run in the USMC Marathon at the end of October. I feel that, having run for about seven years now, this is a good time to check those activities off my bucket list. However, I’m not certain I’ll run any races after that. I enjoy them well enough, but I’m not one of those folks who is motivated by races. As a matter of fact, they kind of suck; they are always really early on weekend mornings, cost money, are crowded and it’s always a hassle to park.
Honorababble Mentions
I became very solemn and quite calm and sat down on the carpet in front of the blazing fire.
I broke out in a sweat people! A SWEAT!
BG: Then Gary gets out of the lazy boy and reties the belt on his bathrobe and says, “We thank Brother Newley here for his wisdom,” but he says the last word really mean and he does this kind of bow to Tim. Then he says, “And that concludes the panel discussion portion of our program. We leave in an hour.” Then he took the bottle and walked back to the bedroom. Tim told us to start loading the guns in the van.
“What is writing a letter to the Agong, compared to deceiving the Agong and the Conference of Rulers at the same time?” he asked.
For my card, I've chosen one of the adorable Kasi the cat images to paper piece. Here I've used papers from the Stampin Up "Woodland Walk" series. I've popped darling Kasi's head and yarn ball for dimension and also sponged around Kasi's body and face to better define the image on the DP. I also did the nose and inner ears on white cardstock and colored them with Copics first, then cut and glued them on the paper pieced image. It's that easy and I love the look of paper piecing - just a fun way to enhance your images and so easy with digi stamps.
Colored Blocks from the Learning Materials Workshop - $30 and up
So Armand is ranting and raving and throwing furniture and I’m, “OK, let’s walk through it,” and he and Joe are going at it hammer and tong and Armand takes a step and goes in the middle, ‘God damn, mother fucker…Oh, you know if I step here, I’m outside the depth of field.’ So in the middle of this torrent of emotion of acting, he knew when he would step outside the depth of field of our camera and he would mention that to me and boom, go right back to Uncle Dom, caged animal. I was in awe of it! Here’s a guy that’s worked with Sidney Lumet and Ridley Scott and everbody you can imagine and I’ve got him on my set!
7 Lewin-Jones, J. (2008) Student diversity and the assessment dilemma, Paper presented at the Languages in Higher Education Conference Transitions and Connections, 8-9 July 2008
think of the last time you had excellent customer service somewhere, and the difference in the clerk who took an "interest" rather than "took a number" in the way they assisted you... the 2 seconds of time it takes to stretch out the gratitude for ourselves or someone else, can change history... who knows who you will change and impact by your willingness to be grateful...
“Make it right?” I heard the echo,
Cheese, Parmesan or a sharp cheddar work best
Clementine
Why do the ceramic fillings smell so incredibly bad? I was convinced they were pouring super glue into my tooth.
1. Ina Garten, The Barefoot Contessa, for those times when I'm having my fabulous Hamptons friends over in their matching pastel cashmere sweaters, and
2. Some of the biggest concerns that the people from any Bowl Game are faced with when choosing the teams to play in their bowl are Ticket Sales and TV Ratings. They need to fill their venue, and people all over the nation need to CARE about who is playing so they will actually watch the game. If these things don't happen, the bowl doesn't make money. With TCU being such a small school, there were concerns about how many of our fans would travel to the game (proposing an issue with ticket sales) and how many people, nationally, would care about this match-up enough to watch the game at all (proposing an issue with TV Ratings) since TCU doesn't have the national following of a mega state-school like the University of Texas, for instance. (To see how INCREDIBLY well the ratings turned out, click here!)
Here's a brief summary of a day in my life (while with the racing team).
Keeper of Crowns
you know her name
Psycho WyCo Run Toto Run
There are a larger number of non immigrant visas. There are basically three types grouped according to purpose: visit, study, work. Those who plan to visit another country will need to obtain either a tourist visa or a business visa depending on what they plan to accomplish.
Converter
A Kansas City elementary school teacher and coach, Matthew J. Nelson, 33, has been charged with molesting four boys in his second-grade classroom. Nelson has taught second- and third-graders at Grain Valley elementary schools for several years and was honored in 2007 as the local “Teacher of the Year.” He also was an assistant coach for boys and girls soccer teams. Police believe there could be more victims in the wake of yet another child abuse tragedy. The four boys Nelson sexually abused, ranging in age from 7 to 9 years old, were students at Prairie Branch Elementary. Police say he fondled the children during movie or quiet reading time.
For those of you that are deaf blind mutes that can't read braille because your fingertips were all cut off by a spectacularly accident-prone dentist, the story is quite simply that Terry's being having it away with Bridge's ex-partner.
(9) Canvas paper
Building on that triumph, Gault churned out more than half a dozen other standalone crime novels during the 1950s, all of them profuse with details of what life was like in the postwar, spotlight-sprouting City of Angels--the sports, the culture, and the kitsch. Among the works he produced during that decade were The Bloody Bokhara (1952), his only Milwaukee-set novel; a much-lauded boxing mystery titled The Canvas Coffin (1953); Square in the Middle (1956), and Death Out of Focus (1959). In a retrospective on Gault’s career, published in the Winter 2008 issue of Mystery Scene magazine, critic and novelist Jon L. Breen drew attention as well to 1954’s Run, Killer, Run (otherwise known as The Sweet Blonde Trap), if only because it’s “a rare third-person Gault novel” that “illuminates his political stance: Republican, socially concerned, anti-McCarthyite, a consistent voice for non-simplistic morality.”
Instead, we can learn to appreciate what God designed marriage to provide: partnership, spiritual intimacy and the ability to pursue God together. So, what is the most common misconception Christians have about marriage?
I get the Boston Proper catalog and often cut something out and save (for someday inspiration) because I usually adore the styling, but the prices are always too high for a skinflint like me. So imagine my surprise when I discovered a few terrific sale items whilst seeking the Prada replacement last post... In addition to those cute ruched pumps, I discovered these three pieces which I just adore (there's a lot more there on sale, but it's not quite my style):
I am proud to say Lavender tea is my favorite drink.
"Next to the right to life itself, the most fundamental of all human rights is the right to control our own minds and thoughts. That means, the right to decide for ourselves how we will explore the world around us, think about our own and other persons' experiences, and find and make the meaning of our own lives. Whoever takes that right away from us, as the educators do, attacks the very center of our being and does us a most profound and lasting injury. He tells us, in effect, that we cannot be trusted even to think, that for all our lives we must depend on others to tell us the meaning of our world and our lives, and that any meaning we may make for ourselves, out of our own experience, has no value."
It's almost December! I'm very excited that I'll soon be starting my third annual December Daily album, as inspired by Ali Edwards. I have enjoyed this project very much the past two years - here is the album I made two years ago. I guess I didn't post last year's album, though I did make it and finished it pretty promptly! The idea is to add a photo and/or story for every day of December to document the month. Sometimes I do two pictures. Sometimes I don't have a picture for a day and use something representative. It's not strict! It also doesn't need to be all holiday related - in some way it's a chance to document every day life alongside the Christmas season.
5. How the hell are you supposed to fold a fitted sheet?
2 teaspoons olive oil
(f) “indecent” includes whatsoever may amount to any incentive, sensuality and excitement of impure thoughts in the mind of an ordinary man of normal temperament or whatsoever may be deemed to be detrimental to public morals
"Complementary Approaches:
We all sort of broke up early. Roger and Mirta were tired and headed off back to their hotel and with Viv not dancing, we decided we had also had enough, by about ten thirty.
Cinder Toffee in chocolate.
Sew together, using a 1/2" seam allowance
The disgorging of the hundreds of occupants of the Hotel Hollywood was carefully observed by new manager Howland from a position across the street and he too had moving vans parked at Highland and Hollywood, letting it be known that anyone wishing to stay at the Hotel Hollywood would have free use of the vans to store their possessions until the day after next. You see, Ms. Hershey, in a fit of pique, had ordered everyone, loyal or not, out of the hotel from 6:00 AM on Tuesday, April 30th to 12:00 on Wednesday, May 1st, as a way of “cleansing” the place of its undesirables. This, of course, put loyal guests in a serious conundrum. They had two choices (1) stick their possessions in a van on Highland and figure out what to do for 18 hours or (2) stick their possessions in a van on Highland and head off to the Beverly Hills Hotel. For most everyone the choice was pretty simple and in what must have looked like the Israelites fleeing Egypt, the dust-kicking caravan of guests and staff made their way steadily westward down Sunset towards their new promised land, the Beverly Hills Hotel.
spring! We're ready for you and your beautiful
I went to check on my son and found him shaking his head as he pondered the canned drink selection. It looked to me like all the familiar brands were represented, maybe just in a slightly different order. And yet Rob appeared confused and disoriented. What was the problem?
Something you may or may not know about this girl...
**The voting is open again for the contest I entered. Please go vote for my country road image. Its the one in my previous post if you’re not familiar with it.
I left my parents house Monday with a car full of food and my radio pumping out some serious beats. I figured I had just enough gas to get home, but to avoid running out of gas or having to stop on the way to work the next morning I decided to stop and fill up.
(Thanks for marrying Colin and making cute babies!)
During researching how I could manipulate fabric I came across an artist called Rowan Mersh, an artist who uses matchstick and Vinyl records with black and white stretch fabric. He’s totally unique. I focused on his work with spheres for this project but if you have a minute, totally check him out!
The Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board has ended the trial because of a financial dispute with the contractor. Monday was the final day to resolve the dispute with contractor Simple Brands LLC and keep the machines operating.
Mixing sex and clothes can be both fun…and functional.
1st time I heard about this play was when I read it in the Star newspaper. You gotta hand it to them, even the title: The Compleat Wrks of Wllm Shkspr, gets you smiling already. The review was generally positive, and I ponder in my head: Shakespeare, all of it, in 90 minutes. Possible? no… couldn’t be… I thought of what few works of the great bard that I knew and tried in my head to present in the shortest, briefest way… it just might be possible…
Please send only by conventional snail post.
No. If an agent wants to work with you they will take 15 percent of your earnings after the book is sold. They will also take a percentage of all ancillary sales, such as television, film and possibly speaking engagements.
As to Jesus, I know he existed and I believe that what he was capable of doing and what he DID do was true. Science is even beginning to shore all of these suppositions up. However, many use John 3:16 – 21 as evidence that those who do not believe in Jesus will not join God in eternal life. In general, I hate to pick and choose aspects of the Bible in which to place credence or otherwise. But as you may have picked up already, I do not believe the Bible to be the actual Word of God. It is a human made instrument, that probably does not miss the mark as to it’s meaning (ie. the Word of God is intact in meaning, if interpreted in more than one way).
Chicken: I used 6 thighs with bone in, skin removed. You can use a whole cut up chicken, drumsticks, whatever has a bone in it.
In his second letter John restates the truth of Christ and urges the community to not rely on the words of others but on the steady teachings that are already in place. Quote: I am not writing you a new command but one we have had from the beginning. I ask that we love one another.
Source: Washington Times – h/t to MJ
So I guess you can tell why I was so inspired beautiful calm spaces with pops of red I love it Becca!! Hope you like how I was inspired. Stop by and visit her blog I think you will love it as much as I do!
Roots was originally founded by Craig and fellow brewer Jason McAdam. They are both great brewers, and my sense of things is that their partnership followed the lines of a rock band. At a certain point, they were pulling in different directions. Craig went into great detail about this period, but since I haven't spoken to Jason, I think it's best to say that the partnership dissolved and leave it at that. Jason moved on (he plans to open up a new brewery called Alchemy) and Roots is all Craig's.
"I will."
But one sweltering afternoon at the local fair, everything changes. Tilly wanders into a fortune teller's tent and meets an old childhood friend, who offers her more than just a reading. "I'm giving you the gift of clarity," her friend says. "It's what I always thought you needed." And soon enough, Tilly starts seeing things: her alcoholic father relapsing, staggering out of a bar with his car keys in hand; her husband uprooting their happy, stable life, a packed U-Haul in their driveway. And even more disturbing, these visions start coming true. Suddenly Tilly's perfect life, so meticulously mapped out, seems to be crumbling around her. And as she furiously races to keep up with - and hopefully change - her destiny, she faces the question: Which life does she want? The one she's carefully nursed for decades, or the one she never considered possible?
Until last week, I got worried quite often.
“We’re going to have to fight them,” Laurel insisted. “We’ll need some weapons.”
Soon after Heflin put his display up, an offended citizen illegally pulled it down and left the pieces on the lawn. Later, the skull went missing. What was left in its place was something akin to a powder keg of holiday cheer.
As for me the only degrees I know are to do with the weather.
"Her sister?"
Gotta be mean, gotta act nice
Moon thought about it. He had no other choice. Moon really needed this little short legged shag!
GINGRICH: But let me make just two points about this.
Features of the show that have been announced include: fans are encouraged to bring noisemakers, signs and other materials to show support for the poet they are backing. Each poet will enter the arena to a pre-selected entrance song. The poets in each pairing will perform their poems one immediately after the other. While one poet performs, the other will sit on a stool in a neutral corner. After each has performed, the seven judges will indicate which performance they preferred. The poet who earns the support of at least four of the judges will move on in the competition, and the other is eliminated.
What to bring: Chairs, Friends, and Thirst!
You’ll learn how to make the men happy. The happier they are the nicer they treat you. You’ll get very good at being a hooker. But when the Johns say “baby you were born for this” that doesn’t mean its true.
This ranges at around £1,000 per patient per day
Hurtado’s particular interest is how an OT understanding of “God” is developed or reconfigured in light of Jesus and of the Spirit – he devotes a chapter to each – but more of that in later posts.
As mentioned in the previous helix post, I am basically following the design and construction techniques from this article in Model Railroad Hobbyist. It starts on page 61.
Sometimes people ask me why I'm a vegetarian. It usually crops up at dinner-parties (not that I go to a lot of dinner parties, although I'm always open to invitations). I usually shrug and say that I've been a vegetarian for so long I don't really think about it. Part of the reason for this is that I'm not evangelical about it - we all have to find our own way through life in such matters. Another part though is a cop out, if I'm honest. If I say why I am a veggie then we'll all rehearse the same old arguments I've heard time and time again. (Similarly, I'm a double bass player - and whenever I take my bass somewhere, someone will say "Cor, that's a big violin, mate". Spare me).
If we do not wake up, the bomb is ticking down and it will be over!
Invocation of this kind does not appear in Rumpelstiltskin, but another theme familiar to fantasy does. If someone knows your name – your true name – they can defeat or even rule over you. Take, for instance, the Earthsea series by Ursula K Le Guin. As the Master Namer explains: “A mage can control only what is near him, what he can name exactly and wholly.” A name, then, is the very essence of a thing. It is not simply a useful appellation by which is it known – it is the actual knowledge. Symbolically, Rumplestiskin’s name is his sacred identity. Revealing it cleaves him to his very core, taking his identity away from him.
It’s because the jobs bill is not a jobs bill, it is the tax increase Obama has been hoping for since he was a candidate, taking $400 billion from people making $200,000 or more (couples making $250,000 or more). Had Obama released the plan, all the talk surrounding the speech would have been about the tax increase, the opposite of what the Axelplouffe message machine wanted.
For all your skills and flair it seems to have passed you by
where the heron
Shreveport Louisiana
They tossed a coin on a Sunday morning after church. Albrecht Durer won the toss and went off to Nuremberg. Albert went down into the dangerous mines and, for the next four years, financed his brother, whose work at the academy was almost an immediate sensation. Albrecht’s etchings, his woodcuts, and his oils were far better than those of most of his professors, and by the time he graduated, he was beginning to earn considerable fees for his commissioned works.
If you want my “privilege,” by all means you are welcome to it. All you have to do is pay the price.
This afternoon my husband let me stay home and he took the kids to his parent's house. I had hours and hours to be alone--an unparalleled luxury these days--so I took out my art supplies and painted while listening to inspirational things. It was great.
KJARTAN: Yes, of course. It’s nice for what we do to be appreciated.
Nick: “But I want tacos.”
I asked Colin, "Should I write about my personal and financial difficulties and even my challenges with depression over a lifetime?"
They are not at all the same thing, but they do belong in the very small category of blue flowers.
It is possible to trace our current psychological challenges not only to our parents but to our grandparents, great-grandparents, great-great-grandparents and even earlier. We discover that so many of the deep challenges we face on many levels, and that sometimes feel so devastatingly personal — not only emotional challenges but relational, physical and circumstantial ones — are literally passed down through generation after generation and result from a degree of conditioning that is totally impersonal and unconscious.
Hello everyone! Today I am sharing a project of my own. I made this tag for the CHA show in January to feature some of the new Tim Holtz Alterations products. This tag was a quick one. I think the design of it could be easily adapted for a card or even layout embellishment.
-Monaco: Holy shiiiiiiiiiit. It’s beautiful. It’s so cool. It’s like an action arcade robbery game. It’s a massively underused setting, that of robbing shit as a gang of gentlemen thieves, and it does it so fucking well. The map on screen is a blue-print, until you enter a room, and everything in your line of sight becomes “real”. I know that’s not the most important part of the game but making it look that cool says something about how much thought it’s had put into it.
And anyways, may he continue to be so hard to pin down, travel ad nauseum (to visit grandchildren and cousins living in far-flung countries, for graduations, weddings and soccer games), keep working (which to him is, often, play because he loves it so much) and tell me that he really doesn’t have much time to talk because oh, even if it’s only 8:30 in the morning he’s already on his way out the door for a meeting.
He also has a great way of archiving potential subject material by going through obituary listings in the newspaper and clipping out faces that are filled with character. His "Bato con lime green shirt," pictured here, is a San Antonio man who he knew through ad agency work. The rest are mesclas of people from his family, or some he went to high school with, and others who he thought just looked interesting.
browned plains along deep waters
“What you're not gonna wait?”
parsley (they call for fresh snipped but I used dried)
The contraceptive pill was developed in 1952 and will celebrate its half-century this year. Becoming widely prescribed through the 1960s, it offered women an escape from the fear of constant pregnancy, and its dangerous consequences. But the discovery of synthetic female hormones had other consequences. Women who did not wish to have their monthly period at inconvenient times were advised that they could take the pill continually, removing their natural cycle altogether. While this removed the inconvenience of pain and blood during high days and holidays it also removed from women their particular connection with natural cycles, whether of the moon or the seasons, which many women report are closely related to their menstrual cycle. In other times and cultures this connection is a source of pride and even reverence.
Not only have I expanded the number of shows I watch, I’ve expanded the list of shows that I need to watch. Mad Men, Walking Dead, Californiacation, Weeds, Battle Star Galactica, Lost, Grim… the list goes on and on, and my summer plans of job hunting have now gone out the window. I feel as if I can contribute to the discussion surrounding television, the changes in recent times and the future it holds within American culture after spending some serious time in front of the tube.
I'm turning sixteen!
I digress. Wedding planning. It has become startlingly obvious to me that attending a wedding comes with expectations on the part of the guests. And I am asking nearly *all* of our guests to do some traveling if they wish to attend. And now I am starting to put pressure on myself. What if the party I am capable of putting together falls short in their eyes? What if they travel all this way and feel...short-changed? I don't believe very many would ever reveal it to *me*...and that worries me too, because I may be disappointing people AND NOT EVEN BE AWARE and that right there is going to be the subject of several nightmares over the next five months, mark my words.
Alicia also ended the episode on a threshold: deciding whether to get in her car and go home alone or stay at her old family home and have pizza with her husband and the kids.
Organic Raisins
3. Dunno - Have Nagila
Then I signed up for CAMP – Royal Family Kids Camp – Tualatin. The details and background on this are soon to come, but fast forwarding to a week after camp and I am talking with a friend on the phone. And it happens, right there as natural as it was 15 years ago. The statement of faith… “If that happens then God will just have to take care of the details.” And in a moment I was transported back in time to a place I had lost. And through the shame, guilt, sadness, hurt, and despair, I had returned back to a confident place of faith that I thought was gone FOREVER. And in that moment I realized that comment that was said so long ago… was me. And now in this next step and in this next moments, it IS ME.
4. Serve immediately sprinkled with the remaining parmesan and chives.
William calls his father over the phone, but the call is angrily interrupted by Mrs. Twett, who demands that William turn himself in because he is disgracing the family and because his grandmother might go to jail if the police find out she sheltered him. Mr. Popper tells Mrs. Thwett, "William's chosen his own way, and I think it's too late for us to change it." But he also warns William, "What I'm afraid of is that you've used your influence to make her come with you." When William admits that that is, indeed, what he's doing, Mr. Popper asks him if that was the right thing to do, and whether it would have been better (and possible) to avoid it. To which William replies, "Why? If you lean over backward trying to not influence them, they're still going to be influenced by someone. It's a question of whose influence is best... Besides, Jane's not a puppet. She wouldn't be going to Mexico with me if she didn't really mean it. People do what they want."
“I’m going for a certain image.”
Think that it's not an issue? I have never seen a three-digit number on the scale, and I've still heard the offhand comment from distant relatives and family members that I'm fat. "Mập mặt," or "Fat face" in English, they'll tell me and then squeeze my cheeks.
What we should really be measuring is which languages are actively being used. How do you measure usage? The first idea which usually springs to mind is to see how many open source projects are using language X on GitHub or Sourceforge. This logic is deeply flawed as a great deal of code being written today is not open source. Focusing only on open source projects excludes vast quantities of code being churned out by paid developers working on projects and internal systems which will never be open sourced.
I’m sure it’s cheaper than the old stuff, but don’t they realize we’re using twice as much?
You enter SGT. James Heller, soldier and family man. You blame Alex mercer for everything. So naturally you attack him with a knife, and end up infected. This is a basic start for a deep interactive story. we of GameCheatr, give Prototype 2 a 4/5 for ball busting action, tentacular demises, and good graphics.
I don't know about you girls (or boys) out there in blog land, but I'm betting that a good percentage of you had a brush with ballet. I certainly did. I had a book with lots of black and white photos that I studied with determination, memorizing every position, how to hold the hands and fingers, how to wear your hair in a tight bun and look serious.
It is certainly interesting book that will have you pushing through to get to the verdict.
We organized a number of lunches across the country. These were purely social events but writers got a chance to talk to others about similar problems; agents, publishers, deadlines, new technology, working routines etc. We had a residential weekend where we had discussions about the world of publishing and the business of being a writer for children. We found shared problems and possible strategies for overcoming them. We gained much needed information from each other. We found working contacts and friends.
“Nothing is so fatiguing as the eternal hanging on of an uncompleted task.”
Stylishly dressed in black with a discreet gold earring and several gold chains, he reminded me of an old time cowboy star of my youth, Lash La Rue. Replace the cowboy hat with a stock of steely grey hair severely trimmed into a longish crew cut, replace one eye with a medical patch and the six gun with a cell phone and the image was complete.
Why do these feelings show?
And they remembered his words.
So I'm going to stay on top of it, but for now things seem to be heading in the right direction.
The anecdote is always quoted as illustrating the roots of presumption of innocence even in US Supreme Court Case Law. (See Coffin v. United States, 1895).”
len@thetwocentscorp.com
While you’re hopping, be sure to leave some love on each of the blog hop posts…One of the ladies below is a mystery blogger and she will be picking a random winner from the comments on her blog post!!
So after the CT they sent him to ICU, and I had to wait awhile to give report to the nurse who would take him. Hooray for overtime!
Here is a list of some supplies you will find useful for using wax based pencil crayons. From left to right is as follows:
I admit this total stressed me out immediately. I was angry, anxious, my hands were cold I was shaking. My first inclination was to call her and give her a big FUCK YOU on the answering machine. I mean what is she going to do…kick me out….big fucking deal!
Don’t tell me lies just say goodbye
To know more about this new blog and the requirements on how to win the Welcome Candy, please visit Top Tip Tuesdays. Oooh, Magnolia Stamps have been on my wishlist for quite sometime now. They're so adorable!You only have until the 5th of September to join!
Listen, Act and Live!
There's something so enticing, about Low Country style houses. They have that relaxed mix of country, coastal and West Indies that just works together perfectly. I can imagine sitting on the porch and feeling the breeze come off of the ocean or marshland.. I love the use of shutters and carriage house style lighting. A red brick pathway in a herringbone pattern, flanked by lush greenery and palms in this photo above looks so inviting...
My next book is publishing January 2012 and is another Viking adventure: it’s called Sigrun’s Secret and is set in Iceland and York.
I shoved such thoughts away and realized that for the last thirty seconds of mental exposition she had been talking. That was a bad sign. She could always tell when I was paying more attention to my internal monologue than to what she was say-
2. Apple-picking is coming up next.
Double Trouble Pesto
Vanessa is even more annoying. She's set on being a bitch to Callie, even though Callie tries to sort things out betwween them. I also think Vanessa is a hypocrite who thinks she can do things to Callie but Callie is not allowed to retaliate in any way.
George Cloney
Gulen resides on a 28 acre mountain fortress in Saylorsburg, Pennsylvania.
I’ve been asked how I feel about that.
I try to be discriminating. I don’t read the long article about Grey’s Anatomy because I don’t watch it. American Idol generally gives me hives, so I don’t linger on the five page article about who will win and who got their hair cut.
Sometimes we can feel as if we’re “planting in tears.” We work hard to raise our children in the Lord, but they wander away from the life of faith. We labor faithfully in our jobs for many years, only to be laid off in the latest downsizing. We save for a secure future, yet our savings shrink as the economy staggers. We try to honor God in our daily lives, but our sin keeps dragging us down. I expect you have your own version of “planting in tears.”
That was before the juice cleanse. Today, my caveman hubster is happy with a little piece of steak and garlic bread, or a burger. Or hot dogs. Or anything else containing meat. Or PIZZA.
Normally those are very hard to find at my local Wal-Mart and sell out really fast on-line.
Judgment came to Ananias and Sapphira when they lied to the Holy Ghost. They both fell dead at Peter’s feet.
I'd be glad to answer questions in the comments section if you have any. Wouldn't this be a fun and unexpected dessert for Thanksgiving dinner?
This weeks challenge is a technique challenge - Misting! Sprays and mists are a huge trend right now and one of my my most popular products so we thought we'd give you lots of inspiration to use in your misting projects and be inspired by the projects you share with us! You can make your own mists using mica powder or perfect pearls and water if you don't have any to hand.
I've got my big boy back to school today so better go and get him organised. Back tomorrow with WOYWW.
After disposable diapering my first 3 children, I have always wanted to try cloth.
I had a great time last week, and I'm already looking forward to IOD 2012 -- hope to see you there.
Banana: Heck, no. You think we grow on trees or something?
Other conditions
1yd -Vintage White Scalloped Flower Lace
I don't despise Michael Bay. I blame Shia LaBeouf more, but I do wish Bay would leave the things I like alone.
The shut door. The beckoning.
Like Nokia, Barnes & Noble, which has seen its stock lose more than 75% of its value since 2006, has fallen on hard times. And a pattern is emerging. While it’s made a few small acquisitions, like the $100 million purchase of video-search engine VideoSurf, and spent around 14% of revenue on research and development on new technology every year, Microsoft is slowly but steadily investing in building an alliance of web outsiders.
If you want to play better, here’s how: jump higher. Now, I’ve had a lot of experience working with athletes to improve their game, and I know that if you’re not in basketball or volleyball, you’re probably wondering how the heck jumping higher is going help you excel at your sport.
Ethan: Yes.
With the encouragement of others in my life, I began to write. Most of the ideas I have had for any story have been action. There is a lot of feeling in action and usually, action worthy of most stories is the result of something really profound taking place. Love has always had its place in action. Love has set the stage for battles. Men will conquer for love, do good and evil as well for love. But even so, I have never let the aspect of love in any of my stories turn that story into a love story. It was never intentional, it is just that my goal has always been to write action adventures in a scifi setting.
This is perfect for anyone who is yet to experience anything slightly left-of-centre in their jazz, as it's still very accessible, but extremely intriguing. Essential to anyones collection.
Deirdra: Who has made the greatest difference for you as a writer?
I love the look of layered mirrors. How did I hang a mirror on top of a mirror? The genius that is the Command line, that's how!
If you are to say Paul is talking about the “seat” where as Jesus is talking about the “domain,” how is this not equivocating on the definition of kingdom? Here the same question must be asked as above: what contextual indicators suggest the sophisticated nuances in relation to the definitions here presented in support of a partite kingdom? It seems inconsistent to me to say Paul talked about “heaven-kingdom” whereas Jesus of “earth-kingdom,” (or why not vice-versa?) without a clear and very straightforward articulation of these definitions and views.
I may be a little biased when I say this but I think my sister Clare’s entry is brilliant! She recently went to Finland, home of the Moomins, and bought this Moomin cookie cutter. She made gingerbread and is calling them Ginger Moomins. She made them for Mother’s Day so I can confirm
In the world of design, there are very few times when you read about someone who is using the power of design to make social change. It was such a privilege to be able to interview Mayura Kona from One Thread Fair Trade, an amazing company that's using textile design to improve the lives of women in India.
Passion Untamed is book 3 of the Feral Warriors Series by Pamela Palmer. I have read book 4 – Rapture Untamed before reading this and I have to say, I was disappointed.
55. Fallen Angels: Walter Dean Myers
"Since we can't know what knowledge will be most needed in the future, it is senseless to try to teach it in advance. Instead, we should try to turn out people who love learning so much and learn so well that they will be able to learn whatever needs to be learned."
the following day.
'what?'
I couldn't find a link to an official music video, but she did perform this song on American Idol last week. You can view her performance here. The line of the song that inspired me to make this card is sung just before the 2-minute mark. "Twinkle, twinkle little star." :)
With this system it's easy to add new sayings, even ones that happened awhile back and keep them in order. I also love that you can grab out all of just one little person's sayings at a time and go through them now and them, such as on a birthday.
The victory represented a significant morale boost to the Mexican army and the Mexican people. As an added benefit, it kept Napoleon III from supplying the confederate rebels for another year. By that time, the United States (North) had built up a powerful army and would go on to win the Civil War.
This small bear with the package of an arrow wrapped around its body and resting on its back was also something she gave to me. This was given to me way back in the '70's and was given to me when I moved to Siskiyou County to be with Bill. The bear symbol represents protection and with a fetish spirit bundle on his back he comes with extra protection. Even then Mary knew I would need extra protection and provided me with this "just in case". It has remained in a safe and sacred place since then. And even though in all that time since it was gifted to me I have only moved a few times, each time these gifts were carefully wrapped and displayed again at the new location.
Peter loves to cook (and eat too), so they named each table after the famous chefs. We happened to be sitting at the Giada De Laurentiis' table, where Giada is one of my favorites! And for each place setting, they gave each of us a little grater. It was really cute!
Level 8: STR: +24, DEX: +24.
Sound like regular kids, don't they?
First things first, the kids' best bud Scooter (the neighbor's dog), needed a bath. Rolling around in dead mice stinks!
Firstly. You cannot imprison or hang people without a trail. So you create a crime problem. The public screams, “Something must be done!”, and you provide the solution; imprisonment without trial and the death penalty.
- Tapenades & Hummus’
Combine all the ingredients and salt and pepper to taste. Cover and refrigerate for an hour to allow the fennel pollen to release its flavor and aroma.
Yeakel also cited the fact that the Department of Health and Human Services cut off all Medicaid funding for family planning to Texas because of the new law, which could jeopardize the entire program. He further stated:
And with laws like this people can, driven by their bias and personal ideas of how a terrorist look like, harass people. Would a blond guy with a bandana named Mikael Falke have been stopped? No but if your name is Ahmad, Mehmet, Mohammed or Ali you risk it.
Why the widespread use of tear gas and water canons?
Hello friends.
The time it takes to plan, execute, then sell and market a story requires many speeds.
as the momentary swells of
Luka Bloom Rescue mission IRL
On 11 October 1492 the sailors sang the Salve on sighting land, thus bringing the patronage of the Immaculate Conception to our hemisphere. The ship that brought Columbus was Holy Mary of the Immaculate Conception. Spanish Catholics have had a clear and unrelenting devotion to the Immaculate Conception of the Most Blessed Virgin Mary for at least five hundred years.
Here's hoping you enjoyed Miss B this year......
He said one time he was coming out of the woods, and it was like late in the day, and he said all of a sudden—the same thing–everybody always says it the same way—all of a sudden everything went dead quiet, and he said, “It scared me so bad the hair on the back of my neck stood straight up, and I could hear something follow me through the woods. And mister, I’m a hunter, and I’ve spent my life in the woods, but I will never go back to that part of the woods again.”
Take a meter reading to determine what your exposure should be. On my camera, I set focus to manual and switch to aperture priority and half press the shutter release. The camera will then display the exposure. Alternatively, you could use a light meter and get your meter reading.
I feel because of you our family is close. They boys turn to you so many times.
“Decades later, I visited David’s home in Beer Sheva, and I went into his room. The room was left exactly as he had left it the last time he was there. For us, the bereaved families, time stops as soon as we get the terrible news. A brutal sword rips our lives in two, and our lives will never be the same.
to this little one
BUT, the nicest way to take the medicine has been potato chips. Can you imagine having to eat chips to be healthier?
Here then we encounter the importance of Latour’s litanies. What Latour’s litanies effectively accomplish is an annulment of prototypes that come to stand for the being and nature of all objects. Through the creation of a litany of heterogeneous objects, the object theorist is forced to think that heterogeneity as such rather than implicitly (and often unconsciously) drawing on one prototypical object that functions as the representative of the nature of all objects. Here we might think of Borges’ entry from a Chinese encyclopedia discussed so brilliantly at the beginning of The Order of Things. The Latour litany is a technique for thinking this a-topos, this heterotopia, that follows from the central claims of flat ontology. And this task is accomplished all the better with a randomizer such as Bogost’s Latour Litanizer which confronts the thinker with heterotopic configurations of objects not of her own making, demanding the thought of this heterotopia. I’ve placed Bogost’s important piece of philosophical technology– and it is a piece of philosophical technology, not unlike a microscope for the biologist –in my blogroll. Experiment with it. Bogost’s Latour Litanizer might be the first genuine piece of laboratory equipment ever created for philosophy.
1-22 Austin, TX Frank Irwin Center
The confusion began in June, when 49-year-old Michael O'Neill, from Middlesbrough, England, made a last-minute decision to head Down Under without telling a soul.
Getting an online health care degree of any kind can advance your career.
Send in your pictures of cute animals with their tongues sticking out to cuteanimaltongues at gmail dot com.
We mostly came to see the goats and pigs. Both, sold for for twenty to thirty dollars each for young ones and the grown goats could go up to a hundred and fifty. The only grown pig for sale was a boar and since you can't eat it it only sold for thirty bucks even though it was a big fella. Most people were interested in buying feeder pigs. They will fatten it for five or six months and then butcher in the winter. We aren't quite ready for livestock yet, and when the girls realized we were serious about not buying anything today they were not interested in waiting through the cattle auction.
or orange, raspberry add 1/2 teaspoon of extract.
The way that God parallels the physical with the spiritual is just amazing to me. It often brings great understanding to my heart of what certain aspects of life are all about. If we have weakness in a category of life, what are we to do? If we want to get in shape, have a better physical life and body and cause our bodies to ward off disease, what do we do? Well, there are a few categories there but the answer is simply, workout and educate ourself on the proper foods to eat.
Walking in a winter wonderland.
That rubs me the wrong way. I am a Mac and dislike Windows to a great extent. I typically didn’t like Windows for it’s software and it’s interface, but the recent Windows 7 Cloud commercials aren’t helping its case. The cloud commercial shows a mother struggling to get her family to settle down for a nice family portrait. She struggles as her daughter is texting throughout the entire event and her two sons are horsing around. She resolves by taking the good bits and pieces from multiple trials of photo-taking and pieces them together into an imaginary family. I don’t like to use this word here, but this “disgusts” me.
“What are you talking about?” Mr. Z got up and looked out the kitchen window down to the pond.
6 table spoons butter room temperature
While we were in America, I found an Easter candy display in a Target and at that point, I was salivating and the deer in the headlights look was induced by choice overload. ANDOHMYGODTHEYHADPEEPS! And they even had new colours!
I saw this happy guy yesterday
Next stop and one we also had our eye on when we drove in was Lickety Splitz, this too located on Rt 16 in North Conway but before the main part of town. I think it was the playground that did it for me knowing i could enjoy my ice cream while the kids played. This is more of your typical ice cream shop but pretty neat decor with all vintage decor and lots of seating. They had these old phones lined up against the wall and my son who is just starting to talk found it amusing to pick up every phone and scream "heeewwwwwooooooo!" which entertained the whole place. Too cute! So ice cream time…my choices of the evening were Cake batter and Mint Chocolate chip. My daughter chose Chocolate Lovers (or something like that) which I was quite jealous of after the fact and Scott's Strawberry looked suuper refreshing.. The Mint was what I expected nothing special but still good and the cake batter was the traditional yellow cake batter and was really good and nice and smooth. Always a favorite. They also had a sundae bar with tons of toppings which Holly of course had to get and smothered her ice cream with homemade whipped cream and sprinkles. It was late but we had plenty of time for the kids to enjoy the small playground as we enjoyed our ice cream. Oh and my guess is they too serve Gifford's ice cream.
Rhonda Sparks, the founder of UV Skinz, lost her husband at the age of 32 to melanoma. Her goal for UV Skinz is to "help families live sun safe, while never forgetting how important it is to LIVE and HAVE FUN outdoors!"
One aspect of the interview I enjoyed the most was when Richardson talked about how the atmosphere at NORTH allows everyone to be very interactive and open. Even though the open door policy tends to distract some of the employees at times, they would rather have the wide-open space instead of individual offices.
The incident: Amy Senser, the wife of former Minnesota Vikings Joe Senser, is charged with felony criminal vehicular homicide in the Aug. 23, 2011 death of Anousone Phanthavong, whom she struck and killed as he filled his car with gas on the Interstate 94 ramp at Riverside Avenue just east of downtown Minneapolis.
I'm delighted to be reviewing Katherine Langrish's West of the Moon on the third stop of a massive blog tour to celebrate its new incarnation as one gorgeous omnibus volume. Equally exciting, the publishers have agreed to a
I stopped, turned the flashlight on an open apartment door. “Here, maybe?”
Do your homework. Don’t worry about plot, character, queries, synopses, or anything do with story structure. Learn how to write. This means basic punctuation, grammar, and spelling. Learn how to put together a proper sentence. Learn the rules. Develop a style where you then learn when and where to break them.
57) i’m gonna cry, quick, hold me! ha ha ha +
Other times I feel complete, alive, and careful.
Computer Graphics Master Academy (CGMA) asked me a little while back if I'd be interested in teaching a class on story boarding. I was a little nervous at first, seeing as how I had little to no movie credits to my name, but the prospect did interest me in the mere fact that I have such a great appreciation for the teachers I've had in life. To drop a few names, Rush White, Dave Pimentel, James Baxter, Barry Johnson, Aurian Redson, Mark Andrews, Jeff Snow, and the many others who gave lectures at Calarts over the years...if I could only pass on what I've learned from those teachers I've had, then there's plenty to talk about over this 8 week class.
Luke 10:31 Priest saw him and looked the other way
I am afraid that having always worked in the health care field has ruined me. This is because I have always worked three 12 hour shifts, or four 10's. And I hate to say it, but it really spoiled me, and I am not cut out to working M-F. Okay. There. It is out. So....anywho, I am going to meet with an advisor at UW to see about returning. Call me crazy!!!!
DAVID #1: Bosh! Have some eggnog! See, we could write it so that Cage is the rich businessman with everything. Everything… except a family…
I started reading One Fifth Avenue by Candace Bushnell a few months ago, and I finished reading the book last week. Well, it took me a while to finish the book since I had to do a lot of work for my clients.
Dec 28th – was told we were needed outside to treat someone that had a bike accident in front of the house. We got cotton, cleanser and ointment and rushed out there thinking he/she was a child. We found a grown man (my age) with serious wounds. We took him to the clinic in Bombo where they gave him stitches, a shot and tabs. We found it raining when we left so George got in the middle and let me drive home. You should have seen the guy's face when he realized I was driving!!! HILARIOUS!!! I imagined him thinking, "I thought this girl was trying to help me. She's trying to kill me!!!" We took the "bumpy way home" and George finally got out and got in the back. I kinda went a little fast to make him pay for all the times he puts people in the back and forgets about them as he goes fast. It bothers me a little that George said the people think I'm a little crazy for taking him to the clinic when they've seen worse wounds than that. The man needed stitches. There's nothing "crazy" about that. I'm pretty sure Jesus would have done the same thing. Do YOU think He would have turned someone away because his wounds weren't the worst the people around him had seen?
suicide.
laid out to dry - or maybe not,
Jonas is an odd one. Anna had been good for him though, she calmed him (even in her comatose state she still has a calming effect on him), but, following the accident, “it started again.”
in Tiresias. What Tiresias sees, in fact, is the substance of the poem.
The class is led by trained facilitators who conduct the program and are available for support at anytime. Facilitators cover topics such as dealing with stress, what to do in tempting situations and nutritional education. They work to help each person achieve the ultimate goal of quitting and staying quit.
And they have asked 4 people to compete by throwing the best Thai Themed banquet… The best banquet ALSO wins a trip for 2 to Thailand!!
My favorite store for Home things .
In Québec, a police officer can NOT carry mace or pepper spray, unless they are in uniform. There is one exception: anyone can carry bear repellent if they can prove that there is a viable reason, something hard to prove if you live in the city!
Someone who has met Mr. Riddle tells me that he thinks he has one of the best jobs in the judiciary, as his caseload is so interesting and varied. He may be right.
You see folks race only plays a part in anything in life if you want it to play a part. The people who are great in sports is from hard work, proper coaching, and studying their sport regardless of race. The inventors are inventing new ideas and products because they are studying, not because they have a certain skin color or their hair is of a certain texture. The future C.E.O.’s of corporations are going to class and learning the proper skills to be a boss.
Ryan Hogan is a Managing Member of Reed Street Productions and a current student at the University of Maryland’s Robert H. Smith School of Business. Ryan is also a Officer Candidate in the United States Army, in which he has been serving since 2002.
and this is the reason why.
A three-member subcommittee will lead the investigation — holding meetings that will be open to the public — and report its findings to the full commission, which will conclude the case with a written determination.
I love you, Matsuka.
Reviewed by Shona
Take the character Peggy Olsen. The pilot episode showed Peggy’s first day. She was Don Draper’s secretary, and she was a fish out of water, to say the least. She was an ugly duckling, thrown into this pit of beautiful and mean swans, who won’t think twice about ruining her if it means advancing their own careers. Peggy quickly learns the ropes, and she is the only female character in the show to have genuinely earned her way up the corporate ladder. But, this was not easy. In order to acquire her current position, Peggy had to make some remarkably tough decisions. She had to give up her own baby and pretend she was never pregnant. She betrayed her family, who remained against her career path from the start. She continues to have relationship struggles, because her career overrides virtually everything in her life. In one of the latest episodes, her boyfriend Abe pleads with Peggy, “I’m your boyfriend, not a focus group!” Peggy no doubt has earned her place at Sterling Cooper Draper Pryce, but in order to advance so vehemently she was forced to disregard essentially everyone in her life. Self advancement only was on Peggy’s mind. Yet she has still managed to captivate us as we continue to root for her, a lone woman in a patriarchal world. We cannot honestly say that Peggy is a good person, yet there is something about her that makes us feel for her. And, that is because we are no better, ourselves.
Investing in the community where the organization lives and safeguarding and investing in the growth of intellectual capital are equally important to the long healthy life of a corporation.
James Ellroy. Was that a trick question? This is another story we studied in college, after first analyzing the movie, the directing, the camera angles, and what made it so great. I not only bought the novel, but I had Santa bring me the screenplay and DVD. I was very impressed how the screenwriters were able to capture the essence of Ellroy’s work and condense it into a very tight screenplay. They should have won the Oscar that year, but I think it went to
It must have been devastating to Duncan and her family, but it sheds a new light on her books and their subject matter. She has also written a book about her daughter’s murder, Who Killed My Daughter?, which I am definitely going to read.
Mom stood at the desk area while Miss Judy prepared JJ’s medicine labels and her bill. Mom minded the time on her phone because she wanted to make sure she was ready for her 10:25 a.m. And the Women Gather blogradio spot. (She broadcasts every Saturday for The Kitchen Counselor, take a listen. I’m usually sitting beside her when she calls in for the show!) Her written piece, wallet, and keys rested on the counter as she watched Miss Judy. Miss Judy called the back with a “code 15” (I think that means pick up.) Victor brought the K9 out the door and around the corner. Mom rushed over to say hi, give lovies etc…
______________________________________LOVE and PEACE
What the heck? I thought. Hardly anyone is here. We can walk and trot—we don’t have to canter or anything. Let’s make today our first horse show together.
Well, sometimes I was in his arms.
comparing the size of footprints is less important.
“It’s black,” whispered Tiffy, wrinkling her nose.
This is a close-up of part of the front of the Abbey. The angels are ascending and descending a ladder to heaven. The story I heard was that, way back when, Bishop Oliver King came to visit Bath and found the church in a bad state. He didn’t want to rebuild, but had a dream of angels climbing a ladder between Bath and heaven. As a result of the dream, instead of rebuilding the church, he built the Abbey and memorialized his divine dream on its front.
Hat tip--O.S.
SUNFEST
Preheat your oven to 400F. Using the beaten egg white and water mixture, brush a light coating of egg onto each bun. Bake for 20 minutes or until golden. Let the buns cool completely before glazing.
This tree was painted for a wonderful friend, mentor and professor of mine at Dallas Baptist University, Dr. Naugle. While he was visiting the home of C.S. Lewis he went on Addison's Walk the famous trail that Lewis walked when he was home at The Kilns. I like to think Lewis was dreaming up Narnia as he walked through those trees.
How much you mean to me,
PORTER CC, POEHLING KA, HAMILTON R, FRANGOUL H, COOPER WO. Influenza immunization practices among pediatric oncologists. J Pediatr Hematol Oncol 2003; 25: 134-138.
“You have a hierarchy of values; pleasure is at the bottom of the ladder, and you speak with a little thrill of self-satisfaction, of duty, charity, and truthfulness. You think pleasure is only of the senses; the wretched slaves who manufactured your morality despised a satisfaction which they had small means of enjoying. You would not be so frightened if I had spoken of happiness instead of pleasure: it sounds less shocking, and your mind wonders from the sty of Epicurus to his garden. But I will speak of pleasure, for I see that men aim at that, and I do not know that they aim at happiness. It is pleasure that lurks in the practice of every one of your virtues. Man performs actions because they are good for him, and when they are good for other people as well they are thought virtuous: if he finds pleasure in giving alms he is charitable; if he finds pleasure in helping others he is benevolent; if he finds pleasure in working for society he is public-spirited; but it is for your private pleasure that you give twopence to a beggar as much as it is for my private pleasure that I drink another whiskey and soda. I, less of a humbug than you, neither applaud myself for my pleasure nor demand your admiration.”
"Right now we know nothing about (the missing woman). The victim gave us a description and we are conducting the search accordingly. We don't know much about the two assailants either."
I found NaNoWriMo several years ago, and have yet to cross the finish line on time–in fact, my Time and Tide novel started as a NaNo novel and still hasn’t been finished. But every year, I get excited for it. After all, what could be better than an entire month dedicated to writing? There are local groups you can get connected with for write-ins and pre/post parties, pep talks sent to you from various famous authors and even nifty little word count widgets to post on your blog or signature.The online forums are immensely helpful, too, whether you want to connect with writers in the same genre, pick up a plot idea or double-check your facts in the reference section.
The first of the next 10 Fridays that’ll be of utmost importance to everyone connected in the World of Arsenal.
50 Push Press (each arm)
Over the past few weeks I have had the pleasure of attending two conferences for professional development. At the end of October I attended the North Carolina Teacher's of Mathematics Teacher's Conference. I attended two workshops where I was introduced to new and innovative ways for using math centers in upper elementary school. The speakers at the math conference were fantastic and I am looking forward to attending again someday! My favorite part of the conference were the books that I bought! I am a children's book fanatic and was able to pick up many of the books that were on my wishlist!
(10) Does “lawful use” (see Article 5(1) of Directive 2001/29) include the scanning by a commercial business of entire newspaper articles, subsequent processing of the reproduction, and the storing and possible printing out of part of the reproduction, consisting of one or more text extracts of 11 words, for use in the business’s summary writing, even where the rightholder has not given consent to those acts?
The hapless Barack Obama just finished with a regurgitated speech on his so-called jobs bill. He said “pass this bill” about a dozen times then stalked off without answering any questions. Meanwhile, as he was speaking, we learned another 30,000 American jobs won’t be saved or created.
John: "Yes."
Now the nurse's job is just treatments, diabetic management with insulin, and paperwork. Lots and lots of paperwork.
Like many people, I endeavor to keep my emotional life within a comfortable range: not too negative and not overly extreme in the positive either. I stay somewhere in the middle where things are safer and less threatening – less likely to upset me or disappoint me. This works, but it can lead one to miss out on some important currents in life by being too conservative. I’ve come to believe that my first difficult vision session had a purpose: to break me out of that protective stance and wake me up to a life with more emotional depth. It was as if Ayahuasca were telling me, “You’ve been asleep. Wake up. Now. Here is Fear. You must feel it fully.” Then, in the second session, I was given a respite from this, but also a point of reference of normalcy and peace. I had been shaken by the scruff of my neck, but then shown that this was not what my schooling experience was to be like going forward. The fear episode was not random and meaningless, but an important first step in an arc of experience. Here, in the second session, I was shown the other end of intensity in emotions, and allowed an opportunity to become situated within Ayahuasca’s dimensions.
amy: the creating process is exactly that - a process . i see it much like the simmering of a stew in a kitchen ... there's the gathering of ingredients and then the patience of letting those ingredients take time to blend together in just the perfect way .
-Dueling Daniel Bryan / YES chants!
A fascination with time is pretty often linked, as in my case, with a predilection for all things calendrical. I'm not the only History Girl who feels this way. See H.M. Castor's post on this subject. I even have a character in my Stravaganza sequence of novels featuring alternative history in 16th century Italy, who is a Calendarist. (That is the Elizabethan alchemist Doctor Dethridge, for whom I have drawn heavily on the historical John Dee).
For the name plates I used Art Philosophy and cut scalloped ovals and plain ovals. I used assorted coordinating prints to cut the scallop sections and orange cardstock to cut the name matting.
Many thanks to Jim for this detailed and insightful blog-review, I'm absolutely delighted with it!
So, what are you waiting for, visit Slicethepie.com to create your free account, after this you will be eligible to enter the member zone and do some scouting (that’s how they call paid music reviewing). The minimum payout at Slicethepie is just 5GBP and it shouldn’t take long to earn enough money to cash them out.
Hard to say why we've been staring at these frumpy pillows for the past SEVEN years! Last weekend I finally decided on some fabric to cover these ugly things. I'm no math genius and I pretty much never sew with a pattern (I love reinventing the wheel)...so I was a little off in my estimate and only ended up with enough fabric to cover three of our four pillows. But three pretty pillows are better than four ugly ones! (I'm tucking the 4th one away to cover with something else and also hope to add more pillows to the stash now that I know how relatively painless making pillow covers is).
Cameron is known to be a perfectionist with a bit of a temper. Read between the lines here, the man is a cunt.
Well here's our chance! An extra day!
anyway ketosis happens when your carbs get real low. Like if you only eat 20g of carbs a day. The first time I did it I was miserable. Gray outs and dizzy and nausea. Blech! But my body did get better at transitioning into ketosis. Now I get a dull headache for several hours, that's my transition sign, and once I'm in I can tell because my body temp goes up a bit, I feel hot. And sometimes get a bad taste in my mouth. . In winter I like being in ketosis cuz I don't feel as cold. Too bad winter is also when all the holiday goodies are around!
A recent poll by Reuters News claims that 15% of people world wide believe that the world will end within thier lifetime. Be it from Jesus’s Second Coming to thermal nuclear war 1.05 billion people believe the world will end.
In her first novel for younger readers, Moskowitz offers a funny and heartfelt look at how one boy deals with change, loss, and the complicated relationship between brothers.
I kept the colouring simple, because that was what I felt like, two different pencils and a green pastel pencil. I realised though that I enjoyed the drawing part of it far more than the colouring, so I did another one that I let get far more complicated and let it plain. I really enjoyed doing this second one, and since my chair is a swivel chair I let it twist back and forward with the movement of my arm as I did swirl after swirl.
The height of Satan’s exploit of the weakness of Peter, probably that mystery of iniquity (2 Thess. 2.7) that was already working even when the Apostles were still around, was finally revealed by the heavens in the 1830s when Pope Gregory XVI, after examining papers from the 1789 revolutionaries which fell into his hands, addressed the bishops of the Catholic world on August 15, 1832 with the Encyclical “Mirari vos”:
The Obama photo-op- which just might be the most incongruous Presidential photo op in my memory wasn't published until the 26th but was taken on the 24th in Boulder, Colorado. Richard pointed out the significance of Obama staring into space in Boulder on the same day a cabal of billionaires announced their science fiction-worthy asteroid mining venture ("space, boulder"- get it?), an event I'm still trying to wrap my head around.
I remember when The Candy Store in San Francisco opened many years back. I saw their cute sign and had to pop in. The co-owner, Diane, greeted me with a big smile and was happy to let me sift through every kind of candy. I was thrilled to find the long French marshmallow sticks in lavender that I'd been searching for. Yum!
SpaceX will begin its webcast at 11:30 AM Phoenix time (1830 UTC), and if all goes well, ignite the engines at 12:00 PM (1900 UTC). SpaceX engineers will conduct a complete rehearsal of the upcoming launch of the Dragon. That flight is to fulfill the second set of test requirements under the Commercial Orbital Transportation Services (COTS) program.
One of the most frightening ideas I had of what used to be "normal" was eating out now that Sophie couldn't eat gluten. The idea of cooks and servers that unknowingly would be placing their gluten hands, cooking utensils, and other items on Sophie's food, leaving us with a sick child, scared me. I have done a lot of reading on the subject of dining out, but still couldn't fathom how a server and cook would understand that I didn't want to be difficult by trying to tell them about special precautions when preparing Sophie's food. Scenarios would run through my head about how we handled the picky people when I was a server, seeing it more as a way to make my job harder. I don't like to be a burden, but if Sophie was going to eat out, then I had to be in order to keep her food safe.
What is your favorite technique?
Finally, in addition to screwing their customers, bank bosses have ravaged shareholder value. My friends who understand these things say that the banks’ balance sheets are not worth the paper they are written on, because no one knows the real value of their declared assets. They are scarcely presiding over success.
Educate your children at home like me, Santorum tells America’s parents :
Butterflies are white and blue
The worry is getting up to speed. NaNo is all about momentum, and there should be fewer obstacles to my momentum this year than last - provided I can keep away from videogames for a week or two. If I can get some momentum up early on I'll be fine - the main meat of DFTR is a fairly classic fantasy adventure which brings together a couple of ideas I've been dying to turn into a novel for about fifteen years - but there's a 10-12,000-word chunk at the start of setup for that which is mainly full of stuff I suck at.
He lives! All glory to his name!
You are all potential terrorists. It matters not that you live in Britain, the United States, Australia or the Middle East. Citizenship is effectively abolished. Turn on your computer and the US Department of Homeland Security’s National Operations Center may monitor whether you are typing not merely “al-Qaeda”, but “exercise”, “drill”, “wave”, “initiative” and “organisation”: all proscribed words. The British government’s announcement that it intends to spy on every email and phone call is old hat. The satellite vacuum cleaner known as Echelon has been doing this for years. What has changed is that a state of permanent war has been launched by the United States and a police state is consuming western democracy.
A BIRMINGHAM English Defence League member has confirmed that Norwegian serial killer Anders Breivik HAD previously been in touch with the group.
However, the first single from the album, “Rumors,” was one of those songs that caught my attention. Trust me, I have no idea how or where I heard this song, but what sealed the deal for me was the video.
I need some mind that, if the cannon sound
It may turn out to be the best moment of the holiday's for me....maybe of all time.
People believe that a Democratic government is the way to go while our Arab Culture is completely different and we have survived for years with our culture. The Quran tells us to follow our leader who governs our land. This is our religion and our culture and anyone who wants to change it is insulting us and our Islamic laws. But the west dont want to force it upon us without benefits to them. Dick Cheney believes that the freedom the US gave Iraq is the real reason behind the Arab Spring. The Bush Administration has asked the middle east to become Democratic. The bill of rights states the first amendment as
Thanksgiving, shopping, 60th surprise birthday party, basketball practices and games, church, and a surprise 40th anniversary party for my parents = a busy couple of weeks.
My kids have fallen in love with jumping on the bed. They love it and I…well, I worry. I worry someone will fall off the end, that heads will “bonk” too hard, or that a bone will get broken.
When I said that.
Opt. tapestry needle for sewing button and weaving ends
I'm sure you can think of a few more.
I get to meet the chickens today. What is a chicken? The small humans want me to follow them. I am so happy to see them. Chickens are boring. Where are my bones? Walk far away from momma kitty. Eat. Nap. Dig in the sand pile. Nap. Eat.
Listen clearly; “there is nowhere for you to escape either” you have committed horrendous murderous Islamic acts of war against us, you continually make murderous Islamic threats against us, and our children and you are now trapped on our Christian Island with no where for you to run except into your living Fortresses with 55 – 60 million innocent non-Moslem inhabitants surrounding you with Almighty God looking down upon you.
The cunthounds on tuxedos put giant balls in trays and “drew” 32 teams that would be represented in 8 groups.
Through Christ’s power, I want to put others first, just as Christ sacrificed Himself for us.
And I am not blogging.
For linguists the statistics make depressing reading. European languages are down by 11.2% while non-European languages suffered the biggest drop, a whacking great 21.5% fall. This has been viewed with dismay by Adam Roberts, President of the British Academy who proposes that it is bad for the UK’s global standing http://www.timeshighereducation.co.uk/story.asp?storycode=418901#.TyqZjIeTy0g.twitter. Like many others, he feels that languages are suffering because they require an extra year of study (i.e. the year abroad). In the current climate it is not difficult to see why a four-year degree might be considered unattractive. On a slightly more positive note, applications for languages tend to have a relatively good conversion rate to acceptances. It will be interesting to see whether data is forthcoming on whether languages students are heading increasingly for the low-fees regimes of the European Union. Let’s hope they are out there somewhere.
When she gets there she knows, if the stores are all closed
the Jesuit Federal Reserve Bank of New York.
During a heated confrontation with an SJP member, who called for “the complete obliteration of the racist Zionist entity,” Mr. Rappaport was arrested by police for allegedly kicking the student and was charged with disorderly conduct. He was released soon thereafter and returned to the demonstration.”
The next day we spent the day at Anna’s grandmama’s house (Joe’s grandmother) watching the Saints beat some Titan tail while dining on chili and hot dogs – perfect cold weather/football game day food.
Before the end of the day all this will be in the suitcases. I've checked and double checked to make sure we aren't forgetting anything important (errrr yes, this is just 'my' stuff...) but I'm sure I'll forget something as I seem to do that every time. Hopefully it's not contact solution like it was last year. While contact solution is available in the pharmacy, it's an imported item so it's pricier, not the mention the Euro to Dollar exchange. I think I paid $25 for a small bottle of it. That was $25 I would have rather spent on a souvenir!
2A) Jumping Jacks
I find myself humming a little Marvin Gaye this morning as I write this post… but I wanted to fill you in on what’s going on around these parts as of late.
Social Media has gone to the dogs. After training, showing, handling, and judging dogs for eight years, social media and dogs have their similarities in concepts and behaviors. *Note: This post is mostly intended to be humorous. Don't be too offended. Also, Happy 8th Birthday to @Mousethedog!
the prison system is a farce too?
05 Black Devil Disco Club - The Devil In Us
Don’t forget to take a glass of water with your breakfast. Water is nature’s best detoxifier (it will get rid of toxins hiding in your body). Toxins are bad for you in any possible way. They can slow fat loss, diminish muscle gains, decrease the metabolism, and drain you of energy. So drink plenty of water.
So, Senator McCain now says it was an easy decision to order the bin Laden raid despite the fact he was not so certain in 2008, and Mitt Romney opposed the bin Laden raid before he was for it, does not sound like a real profile in courage. This is how then-Senator Obama responded to going after bin Laden:
n.o.e.'s notes:
Having said that- I guess you will all knw that I took you'alls advice and mostly slept yesterday. Nick cleaned the house and I did get two mother day cards made. My ink is too low to print right now so I cannot use my own images, but here are the card for the mom-in-law and the Granny. I will finish card for my mommy today.
In March, Mr. Duncan called the federal government’s proposal to create PRPPs a “weak-kneed” response, and said that federal finance minister Jim Flaherty is “penny wise and pound foolish.” Mr. Duncan made his concerns about PRPPs clear in his annual budget last month.
Murders
Non-European immigrants have a considerably higher birth rate than Europeans, and there are no political or cultural reasons which suggest that is going to change any time soon, in fact very much the reverse. Hence, as more and more come the faster the population will grow, causing greater stress on the infrastructure, and inevitably creating more pensioners, and more, and more.
Russell Brand, Home Affairs Select Committee, 24th April 2012.
Are you desperate for a miracle? Are you desperate for God to pick you up and deliver
I also want to let you know that we are having a blog hop for Mad For Markers 2nd Birthday. The hop begins at 5pm Sydney time so make sure you check back then, you will also see this weeks card for the current challenge.
PS - Thanks for all the wonderful purchases in our Tag Sale! It's been lots of fun!! There's still a couple of things left...
The ex-girlfriend and I dated for a little over two years. We lived in the same apartment when we split and she basically tried to tell me to be friends with her. We went back and forth with this. It failed miserably. It got to a point where I confessed that I still had feelings and wanted us again. There was a period of back and forth, she was coming around and so was I. We talked through the hardships and there was a positive outlook. It went south when I realized she was dating. Not just dating though, because I had been dating as well, she was dating the one person that was off-limits. I cut ties and told her it was over. No matter if she is torn or not. I am not fighting while she is running home to that particular female. No matter if she tells me she loves me or not.
So Tommy eventually decides Fiona, the girl he met on his one day in Brigadoon, is the love of his life. He dumps his uptown, high-class society fiance. He left Brigadoon unsure about giving up his entire known life. He comes to the conclusion that she, Fiona, is his life. He returns to the site of Brigadoon with Jeff in tow. He loves her enough to make the village reappear, spontaneously, and the movie ends with the two lovers, Fiona and Tommy, embracing.
I'm officially in love with red lips! Up until about a month ago, I'd never wore lipstick! I'd always used a tinted lip gloss, or anything else I could use (such as eyeshadow) to give my lips a subtle color. I finally went out and actually bought lipstick! I have no idea what possessed me to do it, but I did it.
Post-production.
Child Vs Wild
Bee Products – Produced by bees for their own use. Bees are selectively bred. Culled bees are killed. A cheap sugar is substituted for their stolen honey. Millions die as a result. Their legs are often torn off by pollen collection trap doors.
Lent 5 2012 St.John’s
Tut’s Mummy
My question is this: I am terrified to move to LA without a job lined up. Is there any good way to go about this? I have started contacting families through all the typical nanny websites, and while I never had any trouble finding work in the past it seems next to impossible to find a position in advance from across the country. I am planning to make a trip out to LA some time in February or March to look for housing and was hoping to have some interviews lined up, but so far no real bites. Any advice would be very much appreciated!
Margaret Durst has been involved with natural health for over 20 years. In her early 30s, she was faced with a medical diagnosis that recommended a lifetime of prescription drugs. In her heart, she knew that there must be an alternative way to healing and health and thus began her journey into natural health. Along the way, Margaret has trained with many different natural health practitioners and earned a degree in Naturopathy. She established her nutritional consulting practice and opened The Green House in 2003 to enable her mission of helping people navigate the natural health maze.
I know this picture does not mean much of anything to any of you but it put a BIG smile on my face. Today I set aside a few hours to sit down and complete my online assignment for my grad class. Usually this means reading a chapter and then answering an online discussion question. When I logged on, I realized the only thing I had to do was let my group know what food I was going to bring to our last class! What a nice surprise! I have learned a lot this semester and am really excited to use the unit I created on opinion writing in my classroom.
God loves you!
When Ned Dolan flicked a penny in the air and David Bradford called tails, it looked as though he had signed his own death warrant — for the loser was to become bait for a deadly German sniper. And Dolan had never — but never — lost a toss with this special penny.
The perfume of the tiny Gariguette strawberries was matched by the Herbs de Provence mixture on top of the super fresh goat cheese. When I saw the sprinkles of lavender, c'etait vendu! Similarly, I couldn't stop inhaling the warmth of the bread stuffed with green olives and pistou. Tiens, I think I need to go rip off a hunk of that right now!
Months later, we return to our heroine. Or is that hero-ine (are they spelled the same, the drug and the character? Can I be a writer if I don't know?)
After thinking about it some more, I came to my senses and realized that we do have things we could register for. Sure, we have what we need… but it would be really nice to have upgrades. Most of what we own are mismatched old bath towels, cheap-o plastic kitchen utensils, a $8 toaster, etc. (Seriously, I cannot believe this toaster has lasted 9 years.) It was what we could afford at the time and served it’s purpose well but maybe it’s finally time to let go of living like a college student and have a house that says “I am a proper adult with nice things”.
Duration: I trust no more then 10 minutes, although you could get wrapped up in the illustration
She goes back to the house and gets jump scared by her mom’s arm on the stairs even though she should have clearly been able to see her coming down:
Way of Life
Carry the Banner (2010)
Pray for peace for my family.
I'm not making a recommendation for how to pick music to write to. My point is that I know I can fix my fingers to the keyboard more firmly by choosing music in a particular way (this NaNo, it ended up being 20-odd Blind Guardian tracks on endless repeat - I make no apologies). I also knew going in that I had to avoid any urban walk of longer than about 4 miles in one go, because the combination of mild dehydration and fatigue from that would leave my brain too frazzled to write for at least an hour. So, I got pretty much all my food shopping for the week out of the way on October 31st.
Jeena
But for those of us who know the Lord as personal Saviour we are free from sin because of the gift of God. “Sin shall not have dominion over you; for ye are not under the law, but under grace.”
Baby ducks naturally fall into line behind mama duck whereas the elements of a marketing strategy are not so compliant. It's up to you to get everything lined up and organized properly. If you have someone helping you out that's great, but it's not like that for most of us. And no matter what the case your projects are your babies to look after when all is said and done.
I did not want to give specific examples, but now that things have come so far, why the hell not:
or like to see others having it
brushing fingers
Palestinian mores glorify suicide bombers as ‘ Shahid ‘ or martyrs and terrorism is part of the Palestinian mentality. Many British Muslims hero worship them. In Britain they are bombers because of ideology, not social conditions, and are usually middle class Muslims born and educated in Britain. This is an “enemy within” that does not have to invade because it was imported by the elites who pour taxpayers’ money into their communities such as Bradford, Burnley, Oldham and Keighley.
a larger number to begin with, I could have stood with the cane
~~~~In The Navy by the Village People~~~~ (that's for you Airman Mom who is joining us this week!!!)
Then there was Kate, the daughter. She was beautiful, outgoing and aggressive. She was tall and fair haired, and men were attracted to her because of this. She claimed to be a psychic medium who would talk to the dead. She also claimed that she could cure sicknesses and maladies, for a small fee of course. Men were just dying to see her again, literally. The family though, wasn't a true family. The only ones that were related were Mrs. Bender and Kate.
As you probably already know, the first and most important gift to buy for your music-loving loved ones (at least if you live in the northeast US) is a ticket to one of my upcoming CD release shows.
You don't have to make them, but when you know you're going to be taking the kids to school, volunteering in Susie's class, having lunch and a pedicure with Jill, then shuttling the youngins' off to dance, boy scouts, basketball practice, trombone lessons and a Little League game after dinner, AND picking up Junior from daycare in between all that, how could you NOT want something quick, delicious and ready for you when you walk in the door at WHATEVER time you do happen to walk through the door?
“We can imitate God’s attributes each time we buy and sell, if we practice honesty, faithfulness to our commitments, fairness, and freedom of choice.”
Jenro thought about his words. “Well, as of recent, I’ve been think about…umm…changing. You see…I’m…not that kind of person that I was before.
269 6. “On Crime, Criminal Lawyers, and O.J. Simpson: Plato’s Gorgias Revisited.” Loyola University of Chicago Law Journal, vol. 26, pp. 455-71 (1995). See Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, May 4, 1995, p. 5, May 11, 1995, p. 8, May 18, 1995, pp. 7-8. (Source: Item D-VI/30/1994, below.) See, also, Item C-1997(8), below.
Email: William@skhkdns.com.cn
Because if you are a mom? If you are responsible for the raising of small human beings and running a household? Whether you work or stay at home....you KNOW the value of 15 to 30 minutes.
I have mentioned my minor obsession with all things owl-related many times, so what could be more perfect for me than this sweater. It has OWLS on it. OWLS!!! And buttons for eyes! So cute. I love the way that the patterns is subtle, but still visible. This pattern can be purchased for a very small sum from this website. I cannot wait to make this top, although i think it may be something to work up to!
It's a great read and very girl-affirmative. The whole bra-shopping experience was too funny and painfully real. But even though there is mention of girly shopping, the story is pretty inclusive and boys will take a lot away with them reading this. It's all about self-realisation and coming to grips with the fact that it's okay to be yourself and to believe in yourself.
Aperture : F11
Why would a normal person want to become a Tiny? And not a “Tiny – TM” Tiny, but just… a tiny normal person. I’m not even going to venture a guess on that one. And why do they think that “Real” Tinies, with all the joints intact, are going to be better than Tinies as they are now?
Bracelet and necklace were gifts from my mom.
I am so surprised he hasn't laughed since he's soo smiley and kicks when we play. I cannot wait. Don't keep me waiting much longer lil boy!
December Vogue 1956. Model is Evelyn Tripp.
For the water to decay.
Business challenges – particularly unsatisfactory sales or market position – have much in common with the common cold. Like a cold, we are so desperate for a solution that we may listen to any advice that promises relief. Like echinacea, the lure of a quick “shoot-from-the-hip” advertising campaign can be quite tempting.
I may have been wrong, though.
It was for a first-time mom, who is having....you guessed it a girl! The party took place at Park Avenue Summer, which is located on Manhattan's Upper East Side. If you live in NYC or are visiting, this should be on your list of go-to restaurants. The name and decor of the restaurant changes with each season. In the summer, the restaurant is filled with gorgeous summery yellow decor, which was perfect for our pink and yellow palette. Their food will also satisfy the most discriminating palate. It can be somewhat pricey so save it for a special occasion if you're on a budget.
There are no admin charges and Ten Ten receives the full amount of your donation. There is also the option of adding Gift Aid.
Life, love, caste, politics, drugs, whatever, Rodriguez conveys his emotions with a gratuitous grace.
Here are 7 writing muse kickers for you to try right now:
Also pretty cool would be a giant wall map with thumbtacks where each subscription is going. I want to make one of these. That way, when they make a feature film about the making of the world-famous Apple-a-Month club in which we'll all get zingy dialogue and a super intense soundtrack by Trent Reznor, there can be a montage to carry us through the month of December where we'll be putting little pins in:
have placed on the head of George Zimmerman. Consider the threats of an
They are telling us that "the whole system is going down".
[6] Is. 2:10-12;13:6,9; Ez. 7:19; 30:3; Joel 1:15;2:1,11,31;3:14; Amos 5:18-20; Zeph. 1:7-8,14,18;2:2-3; Zech. 14:1; Mal 3:2; 4:5
The homophobes have struck a temporary victory in the ass-backwards state of North Carolina. For gay couples and families, it will be a struggle for them as it was for other minority groups in the past had to fight tooth and nail to obtain their civil rights.
Reversed (Opolopo remix) - Blacktop
Yet another sunshine weekend; it puts me in a good mood. I saw my friends and we went to Metreon and watched Real Steel, I've been wanting to watch it for a while now and now that I saw it I liked it!
And my Illinois fields, and my Kansas fields, and my fields of
According to the constitution of the Michigan High School Athletic League, students who turn 19 before September 1 are not allowed to compete in sports. The rule is intended to prevent the possibility of injury or competitive advantage from an older more developed athlete playing against younger students.
SOME CONNECTIONS
Debra Winger (An Officer and a Gentleman)
But what about this title now? xD We will see..
A man on a bike, carrying two sacks on his shoulders, was stopped by a guard while crossing the US-Mexican border.
Joe brought this down a few weekends ago along with the Lagunitas. That was a great beer tasting weekend, as both have been given 5/5 ratings from me.
I have to admit from the outside I wasn’t quite sure what to expect when we pulled into the small, cramped older shopping center. It really wasn’t much from the outside and if you aren’t paying attention you could easily miss it. The interior decor was a little bland with a creamy tan paint all over. They did have little nick knacks around the place to kinda break up the paint but over all it was just ok, it needed something and I am not sure what that something was.
Tasting Note: 100% Pinot Grigio, 13% ABV. Pretty light yellow. Fresh citrus with a bit of tropics on the nose. Crisp, bright, tart. Grapefruit, but much, much more than that. Elegant. Great acid, minerality. Makes the mouth water. Wonderful wine, went very well with caprese salad.
Some of you may already be super familiar with HTML, but to some of you, it may look like a completely incomprehensible foreign language. If that is the case, allow me to help break down some of the very basic components of HTML. Manipulating the HTML within your blog can help you enhance your posts.
I called first this morning at 10 am. (I called Best Buy store # 490) I was not connected to anyone and the line just rang and rang and rang. So I called back, 4 more times. Same thing. Just rings and rings. So I called again and pressed 3 for the Geek Squad. Got to a live person and they connected me to appliances. The phone just rang and rang and rang. So I called back. Same thing for a half hour! NO ONE ANSWERED THE PHONE! So I tweeted @twelpforce again. Sure enough, they got through to the store. I tried again. NO ANSWER. I finally got through to a LIVE person after 40 minutes. (which I am seething about because that is just POOR customer service! Wait! That's not even customer service! How do they operate a business if no one answers the phone?)
Some really great deals at Rite Aid this week.
You have to try this salad – the dressing is everything here. In my twenties I used to have lunch at a Mexican restaurant close to where I worked. The waiter there used to make me this dressing, or a version thereof, and I always loved it. Particularly nice for Cinco de Mayo!
I am going to instruct our local witch doctor to put a voodoo curse on the taxi driver who drove to a police station after a woman took her clothes off in his cab. Even a taxi driver should be capable of a little more sensitivity. Admittedly, voluptuous 29-year-old Jennifer Gille did also steal the vehicle, but only after the driver had absconded on arriving at the station. A man who is too cowardly to witness an arrest that he himself has instigated deserves what he gets.
Across hundreds of studies and thousands of participants, Banaji and colleagues have found a consistent negative bias against Black Americans (e.g., Banaji & Greenwald, 1994). That is, quicker reactions to terms linking Black faces to bad words (e.g, evil, angry) and slower reactions linking Black faces to good words (take the test here and see for yourself).
After all, you are home to giant sandwiches with french fries in them (primanti brothers).
Whitney Houston is now 48 years old and is still active in the music industry. She is currently reviving her acting career and is planning to star in a film called “Sparkle” co-starring American Idol star Jordin Sparks. She will also produce the film.
The other to-do that has plagued me in the nursery was art for the crib wall. Originally I was going to do wallpaper, then wallpaper panels, then a vinyl decal, then 3 framed prints...but nothing ever felt quite right. So finally I just decided that I'd rather try my hand at some fun cartoony art than leave the largest wall in the room blank. I was completely inspired by local artist Keith Norval who's art has always struck me as being perfect for a kid's room. His work is amazing and I would have loved a big, original statement piece for the room. Sadly though his work is pretty much perfect, the price tag was not perfect for us.
of my metaphorical heart
1 medium sized shallot, finely chopped
And everything else money could buy.
Combine softened cream cheese, sour cream and sugar in the bowl of a food processor, and process until smooth. Add the eggs and vanilla extract and process until incorporated.
these were the days where the long forgotten utter despair from having an unexpected zit on the nose, a wavering voice pitch and a host of other gender-based embarrassments brought my well earned swagger to a screeching halt.
When we first decided to go ahead with the treatment, our jaws just about hit the floor when the therapist told us that he would need to wear it for 23 hours a day, for eight weeks. We figured there was no way we'd be able to do it. We envisioned him throwing a fit when we put it on him. No fits. Just silence as he plays with our fingers or whatever toy happens to be in front of his face at that time.
We love you all,
The Implementation of eLearning in Secondary Schools (MDCL 1116)
Diomedes in the tail of Denebola riding the occult geometric device
At first glance, I have to say I was a little disappointed at the cover... which with it's use of photos rather than artwork, just looks like one of a dozen or more magazines aimed at the same age group. A flick through CLiNT shows that it isn't strictly all comic strips either, with articles and interviews covering all the usual subjects (film, TV, comedy, games etc). It's bound to irk the traditional British comic lover, but then maybe Mark is being clever here too. There obviously aren't enough 'traditionalists' about to keep a new title afloat anymore, so he seems to be tapping into the 'lad-mag' market a little bit too.... but if it's the difference between this title surviving or failing, then it's a compromise I'm happy to take.
They choose the path where no one goes
He is greatly exalted.
So hang tight and I'll have some good stuff for you including plenty of wine reviews, a few beer reviews, and some new hard liquors you can expect to see coming out later this year.
All of that being said, I hope you have a wonderful day, filled with unicorns and baby Cupids.
I’m exploring new heights and wins
All this Dave Ramsey stuff is wearing off on me. "Debt is normal. Be weird." It's my new motto.
Wow Embossing Powders Suzy West Earthtone Honey
faces, voices long washed downstream.
Spelling – Trainig Mode instead of Training. This is a simple thing but it just grates on my nerves every time I see it. There are other spelling errors throughout the App. Obviously, this is a side-effect of poor translation from another language
Without that sales threshold, in this digital world, a work would never go out of print. However, with that sales threshold, publishers still have to sell 300+ copies to retain the rights.
Africa today is the worst place for a child to be born or grow up due to poverty and lack of opportunities. There are many cities, towns and villages where children go to school without food or eat once a day, something unimaginable in Western societies. Due to poverty most children under five are malnourished and underweight. The children are not properly clothed or sheltered. They do not receive much attention from their parents. Due to the pervasive and extreme nature of poverty, children prematurely become adults at the age of ten sometimes even less. They take on the responsibility of adults; scavenge for food and work to bring home income to support the family. As a result absenteeism in schools are high as many students swap their education for income generating activities such as fishing, farming and hawking, an act that continue to fuel and perpetuate the poverty cycle. They suffer many abuses silently in the hands of those who employ them and many are maladjusted. In the villages and in the rural areas kids walk bare footed to school and even to church or mosque. In most rural areas students have to study with lantern because there is no electricity. In the rural areas children have no class rooms and have to study under trees. Today in Sierra Leone as in many places in Africa a child is more likely to die at birth or die before reaching the age of five.
Really cute and simple! My first crack at tatting after a month, also. So I'm proud!
the face of your lover?
Uncheered, unkissed, my heart and I.
Cheers Everyone! I'm Lonnie Dee Robertson. I was born long ago in mist shrouded antiquity(although I guess that should be evident). My nativity occurred in Harbel, Liberia West Africa. My mother was pregnant up until the exact moment I was delivered so I didn't have a lot of choice in the matter. I pretty much had to do what she wanted but I did not mind for throughout her pregnancy we had been very close. Due to my youth and inexperience at the time of my birth I was rudely excluded from the decision making process as to where I would be raised. Apparently since my parents were already in Liberia they thought; "What the Hell, we'll raise the little blighter here." So it came to pass. Upon completion of the seventh grade I had almost exhausted the Ed. Programme at the Firestone Staff School in Harbel. The school curriculum comprised only the first through eighth grades... as based upon the Ohio school system in the USA. Further education could only be secured offshore. So... for reasons still incomprehensible to me... during the eighth grade I tragically agreed to incarceration a military school in the great American Midwest. Transferring from Harbel Liberia to a military academy is tantamount to being dragged screaming and naked out of a warm bed and then hurled bodily into a vat of ice water surrounded by demons flailing you with cudgels, chains and whips. The following year my sentence was mercifully commuted and I gratefully matriculated at a school in the Swiss Alps. I was much more comfortable there. Having already established a pattern of wandering I pirouetted from school to school all the way from there through college. I went to too many schools to enumerate. Actually there are probably some of them I don't even remember. Nothing good came of all this education (except that I didn't end up in Viet Nam... I was invited but previous commitments made it impossible for me to accept... sorry Lyndon). I ended up as an artist... so what good would an education have been anyway? Art for me takes three forms; writing, music and last and most bizarre, woodworking and sculpture. Since I lacked the appropriate education and motivation necessary to secure a productive job I have made my living... if you can ennoble it by calling it that... as a musician and entertainer. I wrote articles for magazines etc. so I could afford icing on the cake. The involvement with wood I pretty much kept to myself. I used it to keep my boats afloat and to make their interiors absurdly fancy. To add further to my credentials as a misfit I live on a boat. Through deviousness and manipulation I have even managed to convince my wife Jinna to live on a boat too. No one is, after all, free of sin. To be truthful I have lived on three boats. I think I finally have it right this time. I have just published The Borealis... a true story of living aboard while restoring a 90 year old wood boat. Within its pages I have confessed the true chronicle of my 30 years living aboard and restoring a decrepit wooden sailboat... all the while becoming decrepit myself. Jinna and I currently live and cruise aboard our Bristol trawler, M/V Margaret Ashton. She allows us to move from place to place while we perform music and write books and articles in an apparently futile attempt to make a living. At least it's not lonesome on the boat. In addition to Jinna and I our crew of eight Chihuahuas keep each other company. The dogs promote Jinna's and my athletic abilities while we avoid stepping on them... particularly when it is a bit rough on the sea. The Chihuahuas fitness programme involves trying to stay out of our way as we move about the boat! Although the boat keeps us busy we still have plenty of time to devote to writing... I'm working on the second (and last) book in the Borealis story and Jinna is in the middle of her latest book dealing with the care and rewards of travelling with a lot of dogs on board. We also manage to keep up with our music. I play the guitar and the Renaissance lute... Jinna plays the bass and the bowed psaltery. Together, in our duo "TropiCelts" we perform a repertory of over four thousand pieces of music... but we like to specialize in Celtic when we can.
Member conference registration rate starting 1 April $540.00
Well hi everyone!! I set up this blog site last round of 12WBT, but didn't really get to work on it all that much. I really hope to write a lot more this round, but so far, haven't really got there. I have start of round blogs to write, and I still have a blog to write about my experience in my first every fun run from last weekend. However......joining this blogging challenge will make sure I get on here at least once a week, so until I can get the posts done I want to for myself, I am happy to know I have committed to this challenge! Thankyou to the wonderful Kath for getting this challenge up and running, and it's fantastic to see so many have joined in.
"It remained the one image etched in her mind, perhaps because she did not have the film to refer back to. Once a picture was taken, the experience was purged of its power to haunt." The Lotus Eaters by Tatjana Soli is the story of American combat photographer, Helen Adams, which takes place during the Vietnam War. The novel begins in 1975 with Saigon about to fall, as Helen and her lover Linh makes their way to way to safety. Linh is gravely injured and as they try to leave the city Helen holds onto her case of film, each photograph like a piece of herself. The Lotus Eaters floats back in time to when Helen first arrived in Vietnam, wanting to find some meaning or explanation after her brother was killed there. Instead Helen found Sam Darrow, a Pulitzer Prize-winning photographer who keeps chasing after a slightly more dangerous shot, and she falls in love with both the man and his dangerous ways. Linh is Darrow's assistant, and beneath his silence and loyalty he harbours many secrets including his feelings for Helen.
For your work on earth is done is what God said to me.
Raven only appeared in four movies, but they represent a kind of microcosm of British horror as it was in the early seventies. As well as two independently produced starring vehicles, he took two supporting roles, one for Hammer and one for Amicus.
In 1987, Islip Town became infamous when a barge containing tons of commercial trash from the town was forced to sail along the Atlantic coast for 3 months in search of a landfill for the waste. As a result, Islip Town paved the way for the nation to reduce, reuse, and recycle.
I left the yardstick there so you could see the actual size of the belt – a little over 26″ total. My waist is 26.5″-27″ (depending on how much I eat that day) so obviously this belt doesn’t need to stretch much to fit. The back half is elastic, but you don’t want to put too much stress back there or else you will distort the flow of the front.
THAT is heartbreaking.
Jen... that's my plan too.
but what a glorious catastrophe we were
Nature's first green is gold,
Iván Meade - What's next for Duane Ensing Landscape Design?
God Is Still Dead: It actually nothing to do with the Devil or God, it was a cult which takes it from supernatural to science fiction. Think Cthulhu rather than Tim Curry in Legend.
Here's another recipe I want to try sometime. I found it over at In the Kitchen with Audrey and Maurene. I'm going to try to subsitute bananas for the eggs . That worked really well for those other cookies.
Howdy all. Why do you guys think Jews fight tooth and nail at the drop of a hat when you touch their tender Jewish parts? Because they know they’re fighting for their lives, even if only at the subconscious level. There’s nothing “hysterical” about their behavior at all. They know, at whatever level, what will happen to them if the cat gets out of the bag. Start thinking of Jews as criminals bent on keeping their crimes covered up.
shone in your eyes
Otherwise how would they know that they have passed on the information?
They are not producing the leaders of tomorrow and they are not preparing the next generation with the tools that they need to survive in a complex world.
Next we were delivered a bowl of the corn, bacon and clam chowder - tender sweet clams and chunks of potato, in a light creamy broth studded with bacon and roasted corn kernels, served with a slice of house-baked levain bread on the side. The broth had a sweet, complex flavor and the clams were pretty darn perfect. It looks a little skimpy on the clams, but I think I had already plucked at least one off before I remembered to take the picture.
Isn’t ’don’t have kids that you can’t pay for’ what conservatives always preach to poor people (while simultaneously supporting restrictions on the availability of contraceptives)?
So how can we abide in the pure land now. It is an issue of firmly believing in a few key views. First, if I believe that everything that arises is emanated by Dorje Shugden and in fact the entire universe has forever and always been emanated by him, then he enters into everything. I see everything as emanated by him. This means I strongly believe that everything that arises is a perfect condition for the enlightenment of myself and others. With this conviction, I will then be blessed with the wisdom blessings to understand how this is the case. I will know not only that it is perfect for the enlightenment of myself and others, I will know how and why. I will know what I need to practice and I will see the conditions I have as perfect for practicing exactly what it is that I need to practice. Experientially, I will be in the pure land.
- Piece of card for the template
Dundees Ales and Lagers
The puzzle was a fun and interactive way to ask a friend. For Darryl's sister, who has a bit of a sweet tooth, asking her with some old school candy seemed fitting...
A feeling of unease began to constrict me. The old woman walked slowly and silently. The silence was becoming deafening now. I wanted her to speak but said nothing
daddy asked why in the world i was buying this silly picture.
Here are some delicious Mixed Vegetable Dishes from fellow bloggers:
For those of you following my blog (thank you!), you know I have been spending my days researching the best way to get my novel In Search of Beef Stroganoff published. For those of you NOT following me (please do!), now you know how I have been whiling away my days.
results of any test of that sort are routinely “doctored”.
Friday evening's BBC1 'One Show' featured a piece by food critic Jay Rayner on microbrewing. He focused on the traditional role of women in brewing, so took a trip to Brodie's to chat with Lizzie and sample some beers. he also took some of the Brodie's bottles to some unsuspecting ladies in Essex, generally getting a positive response. (His piece starts at about 18 minutes)
He begins by re-examining a death he is familiar with, his father’s:
(iv) Major – General Laitor with his troop of 2,000 soldiers marched from Purnea to attack Biratnagar. He was also given the responsibility to incite Sikkim to invade Nepal from the eastern side. (v) Major-General Morley with his troop of 8,000 soldiers equipped with 26 pieces of ordnance, marched from Bettiah to attack Makawanpur.
Torre may conjure up images of some semi-tacky resort on the Costa del Sol, but there is a Torre of the highest class on another coastline further north on the continent. It can hardly be called the sunshine coast, susceptible to some harsh North Sea weather, but whether the sun is shining or not, I know which coastline I would rather be on.
Bring a Case of Wine
I was always rubbish at algebra and probability type tests at school. So no matter how many times I stared at Dara O'Briain's ad on the London Underground for his new maths TV show (School of Hard Sums), I knew I wouldn't get it
2. Belief in the virgin birth is not essential to being a Christian.
11:23 - Snack time for Mommy: organic Greek yogurt, strawberries, one cup water
1/2 cup vegetable oil (preferably grapeseed)
This is my birthday cookie (and my unwashed hair). The cookie was huge, as you can see, and delicious. Highly recommended: Lady Fortunes. They make custom cookies for all occasions. Cool.
How to Use:
1 tsp Fish sauce
The lyrics seem to describe a person who is unsure about their relationship and is questioning how the other person feels. At the same time, they try to look the other way at all the faults because they are afraid.
Styling our stall is always fun.
Recent Google results:
then with my fingers wiped the other's glass like a brow.
~ When engraving each letter, try to pound it ONCE and use a good deal of force.
The parallels between the characters in Feist and those in classic Arthurian novels doesn’t escape me, nor the fact that it mirrors Star Wars mythology. I suppose it’s a universal theme that resonates with many – the humble beginnings of an individual who is thrust into traumatic circumstances only to find that this is exactly what he/she was born to do. Add in the wise mentors and loyal friends, and it’s hard not to root for them.
Although there are times when I still get discouraged, for the most part, I am at peace.
But I’ve seen things you have not. I’ve been to places to which you are too afraid to go.
his comb is of red sorrel
While it's so very sweet that she is always within three feet of me, she's very little and quiet so she frequently gets stepped on. I'm not used to having a shadow! None of the kiddos ever followed me around like this (unless I was trying to use the bathroom by myself). This devoted behavior has taken some getting used to.
*Magnetic latch securely seals
Unemployment in Spain has tripled since 2007, and today about 5.2 million people in the country are out of work. The official unemployment rate is running at 23%, and its youth unemployment rate is nearly 50%.
her, “……let the children first be filled: for it is not meet to take the
Was there anyone over there really staring back at me
In beauty may I walk
As we could not proceed further, some people sat on the road and we decided to sit for a while too. Then we got up to give way to the police we walked passed earlier. They were moving to be behind the barricades. There were so many with their own chants & shouts but they were chanting Bersih slogans and some pro-opposition or anti-BN stuff. We tried to sit down again but there were so many of us that it was really difficult getting everyone to sit down. Then some political leaders were being led to the barricades and we had to get up because we could be stepped on. Also, there was a guy who asked us to be careful of "instigators" and we were afraid there could be a stampede should things turned ugly.
Brewers Breakfast 6.5%
I bought two Coolie lamp shades from Lowe's for them, and attached the DIY lucite lamp finials I made a while back. I've grown a little tired of seeing barrel lamp shades everywhere all the time, so I was craving a change. They're slightly 80's, but I like them :)
